Journal Artificial Intelligence Research 31 (2008) 591-656

Submitted 11/07; published 3/08

Multiagent Approach
Autonomous Intersection Management
Kurt Dresner
Peter Stone

kdresner@cs.utexas.edu
pstone@cs.utexas.edu

Department Computer Sciences, University Texas Austin
1 University Station [C0500], Austin, TX 78712 USA

Abstract
Artificial intelligence research ushering new era sophisticated, mass-market
transportation technology. computers already fly passenger jet better
trained human pilot, people still faced dangerous yet tedious task driving automobiles. Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) field focuses integrating
information technology vehicles transportation infrastructure make transportation safer, cheaper, efficient. Recent advances point future
vehicles handle vast majority driving task. autonomous vehicles
become popular, autonomous interactions amongst multiple vehicles possible. Current methods vehicle coordination, designed work human drivers,
outdated. bottleneck roadway efficiency longer drivers,
rather mechanism drivers actions coordinated. open-road
driving well-studied more-or-less-solved problem, urban traffic scenarios, especially
intersections, much challenging.
believe current methods controlling traffic, specifically intersections,
able take advantage increased sensitivity precision autonomous vehicles
compared human drivers. article, suggest alternative mechanism
coordinating movement autonomous vehicles intersections. Drivers
intersections mechanism treated autonomous agents multiagent system.
multiagent system, intersections use new reservation-based approach built around
detailed communication protocol, present. demonstrate simulation
new mechanism potential significantly outperform current intersection
control technologytraffic lights stop signs. mechanism emulate
traffic light stop sign, subsumes popular current methods intersection
control. article presents two extensions mechanism. first extension
allows system control human-driven vehicles addition autonomous vehicles.
second gives priority emergency vehicles without significant cost civilian vehicles.
mechanism, including extensions, implemented tested simulation,
present experimental results strongly attest efficacy approach.

1. Introduction
concepts, any, embody goals aspirations artificial intelligence well
fully autonomous robots. Countless films stories made focus
future filled humanoid agents which, violently overthrowing human
masters, run errands, complete menial tasks, perform duties would difficult
dangerous humans. However, machines sense, think about, take actions
real world around us longer stuff science fiction fantasy. Research
c
2008
AI Access Foundation. rights reserved.

fiDresner & Stone

initiatives Robocup (Noda, Jacoff, Bredenfeld, & Takahashi, 2006) DARPA
Grand Challenge (DARPA, 2007) shown current AI produce autonomous,
embodied, competent agents complex tasks playing soccer navigating Mojave
Desert, respectively. certainly small feat, traversing barren desert devoid
pedestrians, narrow lanes, multitudes fast-moving vehicles typical
daily task humans. Gary Bradski, researcher Intel Corp. said following
successful completion 2005 Grand Challenge Stanley, modified Volkswagen
Touareg, need teach drive traffic (Johnson, 2005). Since then,
competitors 2007 DARPA Urban Challenge took significant strides towards next
milestone, though competition cars need sense traffic signs signals
traffic relatively sparsemore characteristic suburban dense urban settings.
modern urban settings, automobile traffic collisions lead endless frustration
well significant loss life, property, productivity. 2004 study 85 U.S.
cities researchers Texas A&M University estimated annual time spent waiting
traffic 46 hours per capita, 16 hours 1982 (Texas Transportation Institute,
2004). Americans burn approximately 5.6 billion gallons fuel year simply idling
engines. told, annual financial cost traffic congestion swollen $14 billion
$63 billion (in 2002 US dollars) period. cost wasted
time fuel due congestion pales comparison costs associated automobile
collisions. 2002 report, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA)
put annual societal cost automobile collisions U.S. $230 billion (National
Highway Traffic Safety Administration, 2002).
Fully autonomous vehicles may able spare us much, nearly costs.
autonomous driver agent much accurately judge distances velocities,
attentively monitor surroundings, react instantly situations would leave
(relatively) sluggish human driver helpless. Furthermore, autonomous driver agent
get sleepy, impatient, angry, drunk. Alcohol, speeding, running red lights
top three causes automobile collision fatalities. Autonomous driver agentsproperly
programmedwould eliminate three.
fully autonomous vehicle drive traffic everything
obeying speed limit staying lane detecting tracking pedestrians
choosing best route mall. certainly complex task, advances artificial intelligence, specifically, Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS), suggest
may soon reality (Bishop, 2005). Cars already equipped features
autonomy adaptive cruise control, GPS-based route planning (Rogers, Flechter,
& Langley, 1999; Schonberg, Ojala, Suomela, Torpo, & Halme, 1995), autonomous
steering (Pomerleau, 1993; Reynolds, 1999). current production vehicles even sport
features. DaimlerBenzs Mercedes-Benz S-Class adaptive cruise control system
maintain safe following distance car front it, apply extra
braking power determines driver braking hard enough. Toyota
BMW currently selling vehicles parallel park completely autonomously, even
finding space park without driver input. 2008, General Motors (GM)
plans release nearly autonomous vehicle European Opel brand. 2008
Opel Vectra able drive speeds 60 miles per hour, even heavy
traffic. Using video camera, lasers, lot processing power, car able
592

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

identify traffic signs, curves street, lane markings, well vehicles.
end decade, GM hopes incorporate system many models.
Autonomous vehicles coming. article, present well-defined multiagent
framework manage large numbers autonomous vehicles intersections.
still exist many technical hurdles rigorous safety tests, show simulation
framework may someday dramatically improve safety efficiency roadways.
1.1 Multiagent Systems
autonomous vehicles become prevalent, possibility autonomous
interactions among multiple vehicles becomes interesting. Multiagent Systems (MAS)
subfield AI aims provide principles construction complex systems involving multiple agents mechanisms coordination independent agents
behaviors (Stone & Veloso, 2000). Automobile traffic vast multiagent system involving millions heterogeneous agents: commuters, truck drivers, pedestrians, cyclists,
even traffic-directing police officers. mechanism coordinates behavior
agents complex conglomeration laws, signs, signaling systems vary slightly
state state widely country country. mechanism designed
work closely agentsthe humansthat populate multiagent system. Traffic
lights leave time green lights allow slower perhaps impatient drivers
clear intersections. Street signs colored brightly make easier see use
simple designs make easy understand. Drivers must maintain sufficient following distance make slow reaction times. Speed limits ensure humans
enough time process necessary information position velocities
vehicles. Safety buffers myriad sorts built almost every part system
compensate limitations humans.
first generation autonomous vehicles undoubtedly need work within
system. Processing-intensive vision algorithms identify extract semantic information signs signals, special subroutines ensure vehicles exceed
speed limit, middle night, another moving vehicle blocks,
autonomous vehicle come stop red light. However, vehicles
autonomous limitations eliminated, make sense use mechanism
designed control fundamentally different agentsit inefficient, terms
processing power getting vehicles destinations quickly.
Replacing soon-to-be-outdated mechanism inherently multiagent challenge
several reasons. First, viable single-agent solutions; one computer cannot
handle vehicles world. Second, vehicles constantly entering leaving
countries, states, cities, towns, solution flexible distributed.
Third, different agents separate, sometimes conflicting objectives.
human-driven vehicles, autonomous vehicles act self-interest, attempting
minimize travel time, distance, fuel use. types agents may aim maximize
social welfare, minimizing quantities average vehicle. Finally, even single
computer could control citys worth traffic, would sensitive point failure.
593

fiDresner & Stone

1.2 Intersections
open road, automobiles less completely autonomous. Furthermore,
little need simple reactive behavior keeps vehicle
lane, maintains reasonable distance vehicles, avoids obstacles. Even lane
changing safely efficiently accomplished autonomous vehicle (Hatipo,
Redmill, & Ozguner, 1997). algorithmic AI aspects open-road driving
essentially solved. problem difficult: pedestrians cyclists
vehicles travel direction similar velocities; relative movement smooth
rare.
Intersections completely different story: vehicles constantly cross paths, many
different directions. vehicle approaching intersection quickly find situation collision unavoidable, even acted optimally. Traffic statistics
support sensitive nature intersections. Vehicle collisions intersections account
anywhere 25% 45% collisions. intersections make small
portion roadway, wildly disproportionate amount. Collisions intersections tend involve cars traveling different directions, thus frequently result
greater injury damage. modern-day intersections controlled traffic lights
stop signs, former usually reserved larger, busier intersections. busiest
intersectionsfreeway interchangeslarge, extremely expensive cloverleaf junctions
built.
vastly improved precision control sensing autonomous vehicles
offer, must efficient safe way manage intersections. Imagine
scenario autonomous vehicle stops red light middle night
vehicles nearby. least, vehicle able communicate
presence intersection, verify vehicles nearby, turn
light green stopped vehicle. ambitious implementation, intersection
could turn light green preemptively, obviating stop altogether. article, go
step further, allowing vehicles call ahead reserve space-time intersection.
remainder article organized follows. Section 2, describe problem autonomous intersection management framework attempt
solve problem. Section 3, describe implementation solution framework. Section 4 presents experiments empirical results. Section 5, conduct
failure mode analysis proposed mechanism. Related work discussed Section 6.
Section 7 briefly explores avenues future research concludes.

2. Problem Statement Solution Framework
Automobile traffic already huge multiagent system millions human driver agents,
various signaling control mechanisms, complicated protocol governing actions
driver agents, form traffic laws. However, human drivers
replaced autonomous driving agents, elements multiagent system
rethought. Traffic lights, stop signs, current traffic laws designed
human drivers mind fail take advantage increased sensitivity precision
computerized driver agents. want autonomous vehicles operate high efficiency
safety, must design new way coordinate them. section, formulate
594

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

problem trying solve present framework within believe
problem best solved.
2.1 Desiderata
designing mechanism traffic controlled intersections, aim satisfy
following list properties.
Autonomy vehicle autonomous agent. entire mechanism
centrally controlled, would susceptible single-point failure, require massive
amounts computational power, exert unnecessary control vehicles situations
perfectly capable controlling themselves.
Low Communication Complexity keeping number messages amount
information transmitted minimum, system afford put communication
reliability measures place. Furthermore, vehicle, autonomous agent, may
privacy concerns respected. Keeping communication complexity low
make system scalable.
Sensor Model Realism agent access sensors available
current-day technology. mechanism rely fictional sensor technology
may never materialize.
Protocol Standardization mechanism employ simple, standardized protocol communication agents. Without standardized protocol, agent
would need understand internal workings every agent interacts.
requirement would forbid introduction new agents system. open, standardized protocol would make adoption system easier simpler private vehicle
manufacturers.
Deadlock/Starvation Avoidance Deadlocks starvation occur
system. Every vehicle approaching intersection eventually cross, even
better rest agents leave vehicle stranded.
Incremental Deployability system incrementally deployable, two
senses. First, possible set selected intersections use system,
slowly expand intersections needed. Second, system function
even autonomous vehicles. stage deployment, whether
increase proportion autonomous vehicles number equipped intersections,
overall performance system improve. point net disincentive
continue deploying system exist.
Safety Excepting gross vehicle malfunction extraordinary circumstances (e.g. natural disasters), long follow protocol, vehicles never collide
intersection. Note stronger guarantee possibleas modern mechanisms,
suicidal human driver always steer vehicle oncoming traffic. Furthermore,
system safe event total communication failure. messages dropped
corrupted, safety system compromised. impossible prevent negative effects due communication failures, negative effects
595

fiDresner & Stone

isolated efficiency. message gets dropped, make someone arrive 10 seconds
later destination, cause collision. rare unpreventable
case gross vehicle malfunction, system react attempt minimize damage
casualties.
Efficiency Vehicles get across intersection way little time
possible. quantify efficiency, introduce delay, defined amount additional
travel time incurred vehicle result passing intersection.
2.2 Reservation Idea
desiderata, modern-day traffic lights stop signs completely satisfy
last one. many accidents take place intersections governed traffic lights,
accidents rarely, ever, fault traffic light system itself, rather
human drivers. However, show, traffic lights stop signs terribly inefficient.
vehicles traversing intersections equipped mechanisms experience
large delays, intersections manage somewhat limited amount
traffic. stretch open road accommodate certain level traffic given
velocity. capacity intersection involving road trivially bounded
capacity road. show, capacity traffic lights stop signs
much less roads feed them. aim research create
intersection control mechanism exceeds efficiency traffic lights stop signs,
maintaining desiderata.
desiderata mind, developed multiagent approach direct vehicles
intersections efficiently. approach, computer programs called driver
agents control vehicles, arbiter agent called intersection manager placed
intersection. driver agents call ahead attempt reserve block
space-time intersection. intersection manager decides whether grant reject requested reservations according intersection control policy. Figure 1 shows one
interaction driver agent intersection manager. system functions
analogously human attempting make reservation hotelthe potential guest
specifies arriving, much space required, long stay
be; human reservation agent determines whether grant reservation,
according hotels reservation policy. guest need understand
hotels decision process, driver agents require knowledge
intersection control policy used intersection manager.
vehicle approaches intersection, vehicles driver agent transmits reservation request, includes parameters time arrival, velocity arrival, well
vehicle characteristics size acceleration/deceleration capabilities, intersection manager. intersection manager passes information policy,
determines whether safe vehicle cross intersection. policy
deems safe, intersection manager responds driver agent message
indicating reservation accepted including supplemental restrictions
driver must observe order guarantee safety traversal. Otherwise,
intersection manager sends message indicating reservation request rejected, possibly including grounds rejection. addition confirming rejecting
596

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

REQUEST

Driver
Agent

REJECT

Postprocess

Preprocess

No, Reason

Yes,
Restrictions

Intersection
Control Policy

CONFIRM

Intersection Manager
Figure 1: One driver agents attempts make reservation. intersection manager responds based decision intersection control policy.

request, intersection manager may respond counter-offer. driver agent
may pilot vehicle intersection without reservation. Even reservation, driver agent may proceed intersection according parameters
restrictions associated reservation. sake brevity, may refer
vehicle obtaining reservation, rather specifically stating driver
agent vehicle obtains reservation.

3. Building System
section describes realization reservation idea implemented algorithm.
process involved developing simulator run algorithm, well
creating behaviors agents protocol communicate.
3.1 Custom Simulator
order empirically evaluate reservation idea, built custom time-based simulator.
simulator models area 250 250 m. intersection located
center area, size determined number lanes traveling
direction, variable. assume throughout vehicles drive right side
road, however assumption required system work properly.
Figure 2 shows screenshot simulators graphical display. time step,
simulator:
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.

Probabilistically spawns new vehicles
Provides sensor input vehicles
Allows driver agents act
Updates position vehicles according physical model
Removes vehicles outside simulated area completed journey

3.1.1 Vehicles
Vehicles simulator following properties:
597

fiDresner & Stone

Figure 2: screenshot simulator action.

Vehicle Identification Number (VIN)
Length
Width
Distance front vehicle front axle
Distance front vehicle rear axle
Maximum velocity
Maximum acceleration
Minimum acceleration
Maximum steering angle
Sensor range
following state variables:
Position
Velocity
Heading
Acceleration
Steering angle
driver agent assigned pilot vehicle may access quantities,
without noise, depending configuration simulator. driver agent may
access several simulated external sensors: list vehicles within sensor range,
simplified laser range finder. detailed description simplified laser range finder
found Appendix A.
steering angle angle front wheels respect vehicle.
angle changed driver agent, simulator limits rate
changed. limitation simulates fact even computerized driver cannot
move steering wheel infinitely fast. introducing limitation, accurately
approximate vehicle turning, including dangerous aspects. driver
598

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

cannot turn wheels instantaneously, must ensure drive around corners
high velocityit may able straighten quickly enough wind
veering road instead.
constants representing distance front vehicle front
rear axles allow accurate simulation vehicle turning. Specifically, allow
simulator treat different styles vehicle differently. distance front
rear axles known wheelbase. Vehicles shorter wheelbases turn
sharply longer wheelbasesif simulator accurately model turning,
needs access important parameters. Furthermore, vehicle long hood
turn differently vehicle whose front wheels located nearer front
vehicle.
3.1.2 Lanes
Lanes system consist directed line segment, width, left right borders
vehicles may may permitted cross, references lanes, any, border
right left side. real-life implementation, would software construct
vehicles driver agents would use perform lane following changing. vehicle
wants change lanes left right, must first establish vehicle allowed
cross border lanes, feed lane-following algorithm
reference desired lane.
3.1.3 Physical Model
time step, simulator must update position every vehicle.
model planar vehicle kinematics dynamics, must make assumptions.
First, assume vehicles skid road. Second, assume vehicles
move according following differential equations non-holonomic motion:
x
= v cos()


= v sin()


tan
=v

L
equations, x, y, describe vehicles position orientation, v represents vehicles velocity, describes vehicles steering angle, L vehicles
wheelbase. solve equations holding v constant time step.
3.1.4 Measuring Delay
Section 2.1, introduced delaythe increase travel time vehicle due
presence intersection. simulation, measured first assuming
open road, vehicle maintain velocity speed limit. vehicle
timestamped enters simulation keeps track far traveled.
vehicle removed simulation, total delay calculated difference
long actually took travel far long would take
599

fiDresner & Stone

vehicle travel speed limit entire journey. measure, zero delay
possible vehicle turning, needs slow order safely make
turn. practice, compare delays vehicles delays using policy
allows vehicles intersection unhindered, non-zero
vehicles turn road congested. way, quantify effect
intersection vehicle, directly (not able go intersection
requests rejected) indirectly (having decelerate another vehicle
cannot get through).
3.2 Communication Protocol
section presents detailed communication protocol vehicles intersections
coordinate behavior. protocol presented offers three major benefits:
information agents goes one monitorable channel,
makes reasoning communication straightforward.
limiting interactions agents message types, ensure
agent unrealistic amount control another.
agents way communicate identical intersection management policy driver agent policy. Thus, vehicle cross intersection without
idea policy intersection manager usingit simply sends
receives messages obeys rules.
protocol consists several message types kind agent, well
rules governing messages sent sorts guarantees accompany
them. Driver agents send Request, Change-Request, Cancel, Done messages. Request Change-Request used driver agent wants make
reservation change existing reservation, respectively. types request message
include relevant properties vehicle. Driver agents send Cancel message
want cancel existing reservation. vehicle successfully crossed
intersection, driver agent sends Done message intersection manager.
Cancel Done messages include VIN vehicle, well identifier
reservation cancelled reported complete.
Intersection managers send Confirm, Reject, Acknowledge messages,
well special Emergency-Stop message, used intersection
manager detects major problem intersection (see Section 5). Confirm sent
intersection manager approves Request Change-Request message.
includes information describing reservationa unique identifier reservation,
start time, start lane, departure lane (which identical start lane unless
vehicle turning), list constraints vehicles acceleration
intersection. Reject message used reject either Request Change-Request
message. intersection sends Acknowledge message response Cancel
Done messages sent vehicles. detailed specification protocol including
full syntax semantics found Appendix B.
600

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

3.2.1 Message Corruption Loss
assume messages digitally signed, possibility undetected
message corruption acceptably small. protocol designed specifically robust
message loss. message sent receivedor deemed corruptedthe worst
thing happen additional delay. collisions occur due lost messages.
vehicle makes reservation request, assume space reserved
receives confirmation intersection manager. Request message dropped,
Confirm message follow. Confirm Reject message dropped, vehicle
simply try againit wont assume valid reservation.
3.2.2 Enabling Policy Switching
protocol hides implementation policy driver agents
idea intersection manager making decisions, guaranteed
follow them, safe. Thus, stipulations policy must
remain fixed. intersection manager could use one policy one moment switch
appropriate policy later, provided still guarantee vehicles following
protocol make safely across intersection.
3.2.3 Intersection Manager
intersection manager acts stable communication interface driver agents
intersection control policy therefore contain lot functionality.
However, regardless policy makes decision, intersection manager must
present interface driver agents. general intersection manager algorithm
shown Algorithm 1. it, Cancel messages Done messages treated almost
identicallywhen Done message received, intersection manager knows
policy erase information related reservation. However, Done message
may contain information useful intersection manager policy.
example, vehicle sends Done message, could include delay experienced
crossing intersection, providing intersection manager sort reward signal,
judge performance.
3.3 Driver Agent
vast majority research focuses make better intersection manager
control policy. parts designed work driver agent follows
protocol. However, testing purposes, driver agent implementation required. Despite
fact lot work went driver agent (it probably intricate
part system), focus article. refer interested reader
Appendix C, explains driver agent detail. brief, driver agent estimates
time velocity reach intersection, requests appropriate
reservation. granted reservation, attempts arrive schedule. determines
unable keep reservation, cancels reservation. believes
substantially early, attempts change earlier reservation. unable get
reservation, decelerates (down minimum velocity) requests again.
601

fiDresner & Stone

Algorithm 1 intersection manager algorithm. Vehicle V sends message
intersection manager, responds according policy P .
1: loop
2:
receive message V
3:
message type Request
4:
process request new reservation P
5:
P accepts request
6:
send Confirm message V containing reservation returned P
7:
else
8:
send Reject message V
9:
else message type Change-Request
10:
process request change reservation P
11:
P accepts request
12:
send Confirm message V containing reservation returned P
13:
else
14:
send Reject message V
15:
else message type Cancel
16:
process cancel P
17:
send Acknowledge message V
18:
else message type Done
19:
record statistics supplied message
20:
process cancel P
21:
send Acknowledge message V

enter intersection without reservation. open road, driver agent employs
simple lane-following algorithm, maintains following distance one second
vehicle vehicle front it.
3.4 FCFS Policy
point, weve described substrate infrastructure enables research.
remainder Section 3 introduces core contribution article main payoff
creating infrastructure, namely intersection control policy enables fine-grained
coordination vehicles intersections, subsequent dramatic decrease delays.
intersection manager communicates directly driver agents, intersection control policy brains behind operation. describe intersection
control policy created reservation idea discussed Section 2.2.
First Come, First Served nature policy, name policy FCFS. main part
policythe request processingis shown Algorithm 2.
Recall FCFS enables car reserve advance space-time needs cross
intersection. Planning ahead allows vehicles coming directions traverse
intersection simultaneously minimal delay. policy works follows:
intersection divided n n grid reservation tiles, n
granularity policy.
602

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Upon receiving reservation parameters approaching driver agent, policy runs internal simulation trajectory vehicle across intersection
using parameters.
time step internal simulation, policy determines reservation
tiles occupied vehicle
time simulation requesting vehicle occupies reservation tile
already reserved another vehicle, policy rejects request. Otherwise,
policy accepts reservation reserves appropriate tiles times
required.
Figure 3 shows graphical depiction concept behind FCFS policy.

(a) Successful

(b) Rejected

Figure 3: internal simulation granularity-8 FCFS policy. black rectangles represent vehicles, shaded tiles tiles currently reserved. 3(a),
vehicles request accepted, intersection reserves set tiles time
t. 3(b), second vehicles request rejected simulation
trajectory, policy determines requires tile (darkly shaded) already
reserved first vehicle time t.

concept behind FCFS sound, requires modifications
work reliably, safely, efficientlyeven simulation. remainder section,
present modifications, created response early experimental
results documented Section 4.
3.4.1 Determining Outbound Lane
first implementation reservation system, vehicles capable traveling
straight lines. allowed vehicles turn, became apparent
driver agents determine lane use exit intersection. Instead,
intersection manager, information intersection, makes
decision. Driver agents indicate request message way intend turn,
complicated intersections, direction intend go. intersection
control policy decides outbound lane place vehicle. experiments
documented article, FCFS policy chooses natural lane: left
603

fiDresner & Stone

right turns, chooses nearest lane, whereas vehicles going turn,
chooses lane planning arrive intersection. However, policy
could behave differently configured so. example, policy create priority
list outbound lanes based inbound lane, run internal simulations using
lanes found acceptable configuration. turning vehicles, list
would set outbound lanes correct direction, sorted nearest farthest.
vehicles turning, would spiral lane arrivefirst
arrival lane, lane left, lane right, two lanes left,
forth. manner, vehicle might otherwise request rejected
obtain reservation different path intersection.
3.4.2 Acceleration Intersection
Given set reservation parameters, infinite number possible trajectories
vehicle take, allowed accelerate intersection.
time step, driver agent could set vehicles acceleration value within
limits vehicles capabilities. Depending trajectory, intersection manager
may may able grant reservationone set accelerations may cause
collide another vehicle, second set might let vehicle safely.
reason, acceleration intersection must constrained intersection control
policy. Allowing driver agents decide acceleration within intersection would
require policy much conservative estimating vehicle trajectories, thereby
reducing efficiency substantially. Instead, responsibility intersection control
policy choose safe efficient acceleration schedule include Confirm
message, driver agents request accepted.
Choosing best acceleration schedule requesting vehicle, even
basic level, finding schedule intersection manager grant reservation, difficult challenge intersection control policy. initial solution
allow acceleration within intersection; driver agents required maintain
velocity throughout entire trajectory. approach several major flaws,
severe causing deadlock scenario vehicles traversed intersection
slowly, unable recover slightest decelerations. scenario
described much detail Section 4.2.
FCFS policy, implemented still takes fairly straightforward approach
problem determining acceleration schedules reservation requests. first attempts trajectory requesting vehicle accelerates quickly possible
maximum velocity soon enters intersection. cannot grant reservation
based trajectory, tries one requesting vehicle maintains constant
velocity throughout intersection. neither work, rejects request. Furthermore,
request indicates vehicle arrive sufficiently slow velocityin case
10 m/sit grant fixed-velocity reservation. grant arbitrarily slow
reservations, vehicle could use excessively large amount space-time intersection, causing vehicles undue delay. enforcing minimum velocity fixed-velocity
reservations, policy ensures vehicle spend long intersection.
complex solutions exist, solution good several reasons. First, compu604

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management




Figure 4: Several vehicles waiting intersection. reservation distance
d, front (white) vehicle incapable obtaining reservation
vehicles behind (shaded) hold conflicting reservations. white vehicles
request rejected, reservation distance decreased d0 . shaded
vehicles cancel reservations, white vehicle obtain reservation uncontested.

tationally tractable: policy runs two internal simulations per request. Second,
allows vehicles stopped moving slowly intersection clear intersection timely manner get reservation. Third, eliminates deadlock
scenario presented Section 4.2 allowing vehicles recover decelerating
cannot obtain reservation; even vehicle comes full stop intersection
accelerate back reasonable velocity crosses intersection.
3.4.3 Reservation Distance
Allowing accelerations intersection helps eliminate deadlocks, problems
arose prototype implementation significantly impaired performance
system. Frequently, lane traffic would become congested many vehicles
spawned lane. Even simulator stopped spawning vehicles lane,
lane would remain congested. problem FCFS, first described, nothing
control vehicles lane alloted reservations. best, frontmost
vehicle get reservation make intersection unhindered. However,
often case. Sometimes vehicle front cannot obtain reservation (due
congestion), must decelerate. shown Figure 4, driver agents vehicles
back may expect accelerate soon successfully reserve space-time intersection
frontmost vehicle needs. vehicles eventually make (a vehicle
might get reservation immediately vehicles behind cancel), process repeat
many times frontmost vehicle gets reservation. worst scenarios, single
vehicle continue quite time obtain reservations prevent front car
crossing intersection.
could maintain invariant vehicles get reservations unless cars
front (in lane) reservations, scenario could avoided entirely.
605

fiDresner & Stone

simple way enforce would insist vehicle get reservation unless
vehicle front already one. Unfortunately, way strictly enforce this:
vehicles communicate positions (and even did, could untruthful).
However, vehicles communicate time plan arrive
intersection, well velocity get (quantities
vehicles incentive misrepresent), possible approximate vehicles
distance intersection, given reservation request vehicle. approximate
distance, call reservation distance, va (ta t), va proposed
arrival velocity vehicle (at intersection), ta proposed arrival time
vehicle, current time. approximation assumes vehicle maintaining
constant velocity.
policy uses approximation follows. lane i, policy variable
di , initialized . reservation request r lane i, policy computes
reservation distance, d(r). d(r) > di , r rejected. If, hand, d(r) di , r
processed normal. r rejected processed normal, min(di , d(r)).
Otherwise, di .
guarantee vehicles get reservations vehicles front
already reservations, makes much likely. Two properties make
approximation particularly well-suited problem. First, vehicle stopped
intersection, reservation distance approximated zero. means
vehicle behind granted reservation isno smaller reservation distance
possible. Furthermore, reservation distance product arrival
velocity time vehicle arrives, vehicles approach intersection
slow down, reservation distance gets smaller accurate. Thus, vehicles
susceptible problem described Figure 4 likely protected
it. second property estimate uses arrival velocity vehicle,
overestimates distance vehicles expecting accelerate significantly reaching
intersection. expectation causes driver agents reserve space-time
needed vehicles front them. Note heuristic works within
single laneeach lane keeps track reservation distance.
example Figure 4, white vehicles rejected reservation request would shorten
maximum allowed reservation distance lane. This, turn, would cause future
requests shaded vehicles immediately rejected, giving white vehicle exclusive
access (within lane) reservation mechanism. white vehicle secured
reservation, maximum allowed reservation distance would reset maximum,
vehicles would equal priority.
3.4.4 Timeouts
driver agents reservation request rejected, driver agent may immediately
make new request. Unless new request significantly different, likely
rejected well. exception request made immediately first
rejected request, driver agents estimate arrival intersection likely
change much instant consecutive requests. Eventually, vehicle
decelerated enough driver agents conflicting reservations canceled, ve606

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

hicle obtain reservation make intersection. standpoint
intersection manager, requests successful one wasted effort.
policy runs two internal simulations per request, simulations may
computationally expensive, especially FCFS policy high granularity. Furthermore, rejected vehicle makes request every possible instant, work
add quickly.
order keep required amount computation discourage driver agents
overloading intersection manager requests, policy employs system
timeouts. driver agents request rejected, subsequent requests considered period time (determined reservation parameters) elapsed.
rejecting request, policy includes rejection message time
consider requests driver agent. implementation, time
equal + min( 12 , (ta2t) ), current time ta time arrival
request message. process serves two purposes. First, dramatically reduces
amount computation policy needs do, intersection manager receives
fewer requests. Vehicles may obtain reservations earliest moment possible,
computational savings worth it. Second, gives preference vehicles
enter intersection sooner. vehicle stopped intersection, send
requests quickly wishes, giving best chance getting reservation approved.
vehicle farther away, however, may wait full half-second attempting
make another reservation. vehicle approaches intersection, unable
procure reservation, frequency opportunities send reservation requests increases.
practice, timeouts significantly improve performance system, allowing
handle much higher traffic loads avoiding backups.
3.4.5 Buffers: Static vs. Time
system involving physical robots, noise sensor readings errors actuators
inevitably manifest themselves. Even simulation, artifacts resulting discretization time enough weaken reservation tiles guarantees exclusivity.
intersection, vehicles move high speeds different directions, potential
sources calamity cannot ignored. example, happens driver agent
realizes make reservation exactly time, close enough intersection
possible stop entering intersection? sort safety buffer
required. Two types buffers natural: static buffers time buffers.
Static buffersbuffers whose size constantcertainly suffice safety purposes.
intersection manager assumes vehicle ten times large dimension, certainly
vehicle even get close another vehicle. However, defeats point
intersection manager, leverage increased precision autonomous vehicles.
Furthermore, static buffer take account direction motion vehicle.
Two vehicles whose paths would never intersect may begin interfere one anothers
reservation process large static buffer used, Figure 5(a).
Time buffers, hand, take account motion vehicles.
intersection manager instead assumes vehicle might early late, actual
area restricted buffer shrink grow vehicles velocity,
607

fiDresner & Stone





























(a) Static buffer

(b) Time buffer, low velocity

























(c) Time buffer, high velocity

(d) Hybrid buffer

Figure 5: Various styles buffers designed cope sensor noise actuator errors.
hatched areas show buffers would cause reservation conflicts: one
pair conflicting vehicles would granted reservation.

direction movement. Figures 5(b) 5(c) show buffer scales speed
vehicle. Thus, two vehicles traveling along parallel lines, time buffers
vehicles interfere unless vehicles could potentially collide (they
lane lanes close together vehicles width). Alone, time buffers
sufficient guarantee safety small error lateral positioning (orthogonal
direction motion) may still cause collision. Figure 5(d) shows best solution:
hybrid buffer. hybrid buffer time buffer scales velocity, well
small static buffer protects lateral positioning errors serves minimum
buffer slow-moving vehicles.
3.4.6 Edge Tiles
driving open road, vehicles must maintain reasonable following interval
(usually measured amount time) one another. vehicle decelerates suddenly, puts vehicle behind dangerous situationif rear vehicle doesnt react
quickly enough, may collide front vehicle. intersection, following intervals
practical, vehicles traveling many different directions. Vehicles
intersection cannot react normally sensor readings, intersection
manager may orchestrate close calls would look potential collision
vehicle operating open road mode. Instead, vehicles trust constraints given
intersection manager. pose problem intersection,
vehicle exits intersection, may enounter vehicle left
intersection, much slower velocity. shown Figures 6(a) 6(b), may
lead unavoidable collision, later vehicle unable stop quickly enough.
Even autonomous vehicles, react almost instantaneously, amount
following interval required vehicles leaving intersection.
608

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

B



B





B

(a) turns right front
B.

(b) B cannot stop time.

(c) B must slow preemptively.

Figure 6: Edge tiles prevent collisions vehicles leave intersection. 6(a), vehicle
turns front vehicle B, traveling slowly making right turn.
6(b), vehicle B gets intersection without incident, finds
leaves intersection, cannot stop colliding vehicle A.
extra buffers edge tiles, shown 6(c), prevent vehicle B obtaining
reservation would cause exit intersection close vehicle A.
shaded tiles edge tiles, darkly shaded tiles specific tiles
would prevent collision 6(a) 6(b).

first-cut solution problem simply increase time buffers reservation tiles desired following interval. Thus, vehicles require following interval
one second exiting intersection, vehicle able reserve tile
within one second another vehicle. ensures vehicles leaving intersection
lane exit within one second other, gap
least one second vehicles. Unfortunately, wreaks havoc FCFSs
ability conduct vehicles efficiently intersection. close calls
system gets efficiency advantages longer possible.
Instead, divide reservation tiles two groups. Internal tiles tiles
surrounded sides reservation tiles. Edge tiles, shown shaded
Figure 6(c), tiles abut intersection. sufficiently high granularities, edge
tiles relatively small fraction total number tiles. tiles
increase time buffer desired following interval. (at sufficiently
high granularities) vehicles leaving lane require edge tiles,
modification enforces desired following intervals without otherwise preventing
intersection exploiting ability interleave vehicles closely.
3.5 Policies
layer abstraction provided protocol, intersection manager
work emulation mode, imitating modern-day control mechanisms, stop
sign traffic light. briefly explain implementation two intersection control
policies designed mimic mechanisms.
609

fiDresner & Stone

Algorithm 2 FCFSs request processing algorithm. FCFS persistent state variables:
tiles, map tiles times vehicles, reservations, map vehicles sets
tiles, timeouts, map vehicles times.
1: tc current time
2: timeouts[vehicle id] < tc
3:
reject request
4: ta proposed arrival time
5: timeouts[vehicle id] tc + min(0.5, (ta tc )/2)
6: acceleration {true, false}
7:
tile times {}
8:
ta
9:
V temporary vehicle initialized according reservation parameters
10:
V intersection
11:
tiles occupied V V static buffer time
12:
tile times tile times {(t, S)}
13:

14:
edge tile
15:
buf edge tile buffer
16:
else
17:
buf internal tile buffer
18:
= buf buf
19:
tiles[s, + i] reserved another vehicle
20:
acceleration
21:
goto line 29
22:
else
23:
reject request
24:
+ time step
25:
move V according physical model
26:
acceleration
27:
increase V velocity V maximum acceleration
28:
break
29:
30:
31:
32:
33:
34:
35:
36:
37:
38:
39:

request change
old tile times reservations[vehicle id]
(ti , Si ) old tile times
Si
clear reserved status tiles[s, ti ]
(ti , Si ) tile times
Si
tiles[s, ti ] vehicle id
reservations[vehicle id] tile times
accept request, return reservation constraints (incl. accelerations)

610

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Stop-Sign Stop signs traditionally used intersections light traffic.
much cost-effective reliable, cannot provide throughput
efficiency traffic light. Thus, would never reason system
emulate stop sign, however include description completeness.
Stop-Sign exactly FCFS, except accepts reservations vehicles
stopped intersection. reservation requests rejected
message indicating vehicle must stop intersection. intersection
determines whether vehicle stopped intersection examining difference
current time arrival time request message.
Traffic-Light Traffic-Light policy receives reservation request message,
calculates next time proposed arrival time light sending
vehicles lane green. responds confirmation message reflects
information. confirmation messages maximum tolerable errors associated them, intersection manager uses errors encode beginning
end green light period.
3.6 Compatibility Human Drivers
intersection control mechanism autonomous vehicles someday
useful, always people enjoy driving. Additionally, fairly
long transitional period current situation (all human drivers) one
human drivers rarity. Even switching system comprised solely autonomous
vehicles possible, pedestrians cyclists must able traverse intersections
controlled safe manner. reason, necessary create intersection control
policies aware able accommodate humans, whether bicycle,
walking corner store, driving classic car entertainment purposes.
section explain extended FCFS policy reservation framework
incorporate human drivers. order accommodate human drivers, control policy
must able direct human autonomous vehicles, coordinating them,
despite much less control information regarding human
drivers be. main concept behind extension assumption
human-driven vehicle anywhere one could be. may less efficient
approach attempts precisely model human behavior, guaranteed
safe, one desiderata unwilling compromise. Adding pedestrians
cyclists follows naturally, give brief descriptions would differ
extensions human drivers.
Compatibility human drivers offers ability handle occasional
human driver levels human drivers everyday traffic reaches steady state.
help facilitate transition current standardall human-driven vehicles
steady state, human drivers scarce. Section 2.1, emphasized
need incremental deployability. show experimentally, human compatibility
adds significantly incremental deployability reservation system.
show specifics implementation offer benefits: incentives
communities private individuals adopt autonomous vehicle technology.
611

fiDresner & Stone

3.6.1 Using Existing Infrastructure
reliable method communicating human drivers prerequisite including
system. simplest best solution use something human drivers
already know understand traffic lights. Traffic light infrastructure already present
many intersections engineering manufacturing traffic light systems well
developed. pedestrians cyclists, standard push-button crossing signals
used give enough time person traverse intersection. serve
alert intersection presence.
3.6.2 Light Models
real traffic lights used communicate human drivers, must controlled
understood intersection manager. Thus, add new component
intersection control policy, called light model. light model controls physical lights
well providing information policy make decisions.
complicated scenarios, light model modified control policy, example,
order adapt changing traffic conditions. lights semantics
modern-day lights: red (do enter), yellow (if possible, enter; light soon
red), green (enter). control policy requires light model human users
know do. instance, light model FCFS keeps lights red
times, indicating humans never safe enter. Traffic-Light policys light
model, hand, corresponds exactly light system policy emulating.
Here, describe light models used experiments.
All-Lanes model, similar current traffic light systems,
direction succession gets green lights lanes. Thus, northbound traffic (turning
going straight) green lights eastbound, westbound, southbound traffic
red lights. green lights cycle directions. similar
current traffic lights, light model particularly well-suited controlling
distributions vehicles significant contingents human drivers. demonstrate
fact experimentally Section 4.5. Figure 7 shows graphical depiction light model.

Figure 7: All-Lanes light model. direction gets green lights cycle: north,
east, south, west. phase, available paths autonomous
vehicles red lights right turns.

Single-Lane Single-Lane light model, green light rotates lanes
one time instead direction. example, left turn lane northbound traffic
612

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

would green light, lanes would red light. Next, straight
lane northbound traffic would green light, right turn. Next, green
light would go lane eastbound traffic, forth. graphical description
models cycle seen Figure 8. light model work well
vehicles human-driven, show, useful intersections
control mostly autonomous vehicles need handle occasional human
driver.

Figure 8: Single-Lane light model. individual lane gets green light (left turn,
straight, right turn), process repeated direction. Note
smaller part intersection used human vehicles given
time. rest intersection available autonomous vehicles.

3.6.3 FCFS-Light Policy
order obtain benefits FCFS policy still accommodating human
drivers, policy needs two things:
1. light green, ensure safe vehicle (autonomous human-driven)
drive intersection lane light regulates.
2. Grant reservations driver agents whenever possible. Autonomous vehicles thus
move red lights (whereas humans cannot), provided reservation
similar right red, extended much safe situations.
policy FCFS-Light, these, described follows:
FCFS, intersection divided grid n n tiles.
Upon receiving request message, policy uses parameters message
establish vehicle arrive intersection.
light controlling lane vehicle arrive intersection
green time, reservation confirmed.
light controlling lane yellow, reservation rejected.
light controlling lane red, journey vehicle simulated
FCFS (Section 3.4).
throughout simulation, required tile reserved another vehicle use
lane green yellow light, policy reserves tiles confirms
reservation. Otherwise, request rejected.
613

fiDresner & Stone

REQUEST
Preprocess

Yes,
Restrictions

Red

Light Model

No, Reason

FCFS

REJECT

Postprocess

Yellow

Driver
Agent

Green

CONFIRM

Intersection Manager

Figure 9: FCFS-Light combination FCFS light model. request
received, FCFS-Light first checks see color light be.
green, grants request. yellow, rejects. red, defers
FCFS.

Off-Limits Tiles Unfortunately, simply deferring FCFS guarantee safety
vehicle. vehicle granted reservation conflicts vehicle following
physical lights, collision could easily ensue. determine tiles use
light system given time, associate set off-limits tiles light.
example, light northbound left turn lane green (or yellow), tiles
could used vehicle turning left lane considered reserved
purposes FCFS. length yellow light adjusted vehicles entering
intersection enough time clear intersection tiles longer
limits.
FCFS-Light Subsumes FCFS Using traffic lightlike light model (for example AllLanes), FCFS-Light behave exactly Traffic-Light drivers human.
light model keeps lights constantly red, FCFS-Light behaves exactly
FCFS. case, human drivers present fail spectacularly, leaving
humans stuck intersection indefinitely. However, absence human drivers,
perform exceptionally well. FCFS special case FCFS-Light. thus
alter FCFS-Lights behavior vary strictly superior Traffic-Light exactly
FCFS.
3.7 Emergency Vehicles
current traffic laws special procedures involving emergency vehicles
ambulances, fire trucks, police cars. Vehicles required pull side
road come complete stop emergency vehicle passed.
emergency vehicle may traveling quickly, posing danger
vehicles, emergency vehicle must arrive destination quickly
possiblelives may stake. Hopefully, system implemented,
automobile accidentsa major reason emergency vehicles dispatchedwill
eradicated. Nonetheless, emergency vehicles still required time time fires,
heart attacks, emergencies still exist. previously proposed
methods giving priority emergency vehicles (Dresner & Stone, 2006),
present new, simpler method, fully implemented tested.
614

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

3.7.1 Augmenting Protocol
order accommodate emergency vehicles, intersection manager must first able
detect presence. easiest way accomplish add new field
request messages. implementation, field simply flag indicates
intersection manager requesting vehicle emergency vehicle emergency
situation (lights flashing siren blaring). practice, however, safeguards would need
incorporated prevent normal vehicles abusing feature order obtain
preferential treatment. could accomplished using sort secret key instead
simply boolean value, even sort public/private key challenge/response mechanism. details implementation, however, beyond scope project
already well-studied area cryptography computer security.
3.7.2 FCFS-Emerg Policy
intersection control policy detect emergency vehicles, process reservation requests giving priority emergency vehicles. first-cut solution simply
deny reservations vehicles emergency vehicles. However, solution
satisfactory, traffic comes stop due rejected reservation
requests, emergency vehicles may get stuck resulting congestion. Instead,
FCFS-Emerg policy keeps track lanes currently contain approaching emergency
vehicles. long least one emergency vehicle approaching intersection,
policy grants reservations vehicles lanes. ensures vehicles front
emergency vehicles receive priority. Due increase priority, lanes
emergency vehicles tend empty rapidly, allowing emergency vehicles proceed
relatively unhindered.
3.8 Summary
section, explained created reservation-based intersection control
mechanism simulation. described construction simulator itself, well
communication protocol, intersection manager, driver agent, several
intersection control policies. first policy, FCFS fully autonomous vehicles.
FCFS-Light extends FCFS allow human interoperability using existing traffic light
infrastructure. last policy, FCFS-Emerg, extends FCFS give priority emergency
vehicles without significant increasing delays vehicles.

4. Experimental Results
section, fully test features introduced Section 3 demonstrate
reservation system reduce delay two orders magnitude. experiments evaluate performance reservation system using different intersection control policies,
amounts traffic, granularities, levels human drivers, presence emergency
vehicles. first compare system using FCFS traffic lights varying cycle periods
using prototype simulator. show results full version, including stop
sign control policy implemented protocol, comparing results
traffic light experiments. Next, experiment allowing vehicles turn
615

fiDresner & Stone

lanesomething would extremely dangerous without reservation-based mechanism. Finally, evaluate two extensions FCFS: FCFS-Light FCFS-Emerg.
Videos simulator action, including many scenarios section, well
supplementary materials found http://www.cs.utexas.edu/~kdresner/aim/.
4.1 Low-Granularity FCFS vs. Traffic Light
simplest implementation FCFS granularity 1the entire intersection single reservation tile. one vehicle may intersection time,
vehicle traveling sufficiently fast, total amount time occupy
intersection small. increase granularity 2, intersection longer entirely exclusive. example, non-turning vehicles traveling north longer compete
reservation tiles non-turning vehicles traveling south (similarly, eastbound
westbound non-turning vehicles longer compete). present initial results
comparing two instances reservation mechanism several incarnations
traffic light.
4.1.1 Experimental Setup
experiments carried using prototype version simulator, fully
described earlier publication (Dresner & Stone, 2004). version simulator,
vehicles allowed turn accelerate intersection. restrictions
detract core challenge problem, results relevant even
restrictions relaxed. simulation contains one lane traveling direction,
speed limits 25 meters per second. Traffic spawning probability varies
0.0001 0.02 increments 0.0001, configuration runs 500,000 steps
simulator, corresponds approximately 2.5 hours simulated time.
4.1.2 Results
Figure 10(a) shows delay times traffic light systems varying periods, ranging
extremely short (10 seconds) fairly long (50 seconds). expected real-life experience, short-period traffic lights control light traffic well, traffic lights longer
periods work better heavy-traffic scenarios. traffic sparse, short period allows
vehicles wait shorter time getting green light. many cities, traffic light
periods shortened early hours morning take advantage fact.
scenarios densely packed vehicles, per-vehicle costs slowing stop
accelerating back full speed, well intervals needed clear intersection
(the time yellow light, lights red), tend dominate.
makes longer-period lights better situations. Figure 10(a),
certain traffic level, traffic light systems reaches appears maximum
delay level. artifact simulatorwhen traffic level gets high enough,
vehicles back far simulator cannot keep track (it cannot spawn
new vehicles, lack place put them). point, vehicles arriving
intersection faster traffic lights safely coordinate passage. Thus,
point delay spikes upwards indicates maximum throughput traffic
configuration.
616

fi100
90
80
70
60
50
40
30
20
10
0

0.7
Period 10

0.6

Period 30

Average Delay (s)

Average Delay (s)

Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Period 50

Granularity 1

0.5
0.4
0.3
Granularity 1
0.2
Granularity 2

0.1
0
0.2

0.4

0.6

0.8

1

0.2

Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

0.4

0.6

0.8

1

Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

(a) Reservation vs. Traffic Light

(b) Increasing Granularity

Figure 10: 10(a) shows average delays traffic light systems period 10, 30, 50 seconds plotted varying traffic levels along 1-tiled reservation-based
system. 10(b) shows average delays granularity 1 2 FCFS policies
varying traffic levels. Spawning probability varied increments 0.0001,
configuration run 1,000,000 steps simulation (approximately
5.5 hours simulated time). direction 1 lane.

Figure 10(a) delays granularity-1 2 FCFS policies.
car spawning probability 0.013, granularity-1 policys delay visually
indistinguishable x-axis, true granularity-2 reservation system
whole graph. Figure 10(b) shows bottom 0.7% graph, enlarged show
results detail. vehicle spawning rate 0.02, traffic light
systems already beyond maximum capacity, granularity-2 system allowing
vehicles without even adding tenth second average vehicles travel
time.
4.2 Choosing Granularity
note Figure 10(a) spike delay granularity-1 FCFS policy. system looks though behaving chaoticallyin Figure 10(b), delay slowly steadily
increases traffic level, spiking graph probability spawning
vehicle time step reaches 0.013.
granularity-1 system, vehicles traveling parallel one another compete
tiles. happens vehicles lanes closest middle
road whenever granularity small, odd number, Figure 11(b). Recall
prototype simulator, acceleration intersection forbidden. Thus, vehicle
slows cannot obtain reservation, finally get reservation
moving slowly entirety reservation occupy reservation
tiles longer period time. next car approach intersection therefore
likely slow well. process feeds vehicles slow
more. small average amounts traffic, delays increase, system
recovers probabilistically generated periods light traffic. However, heavy
617

fiDresner & Stone

traffic, intersection eventually reach deadlocked state. traffic generated
stochastically, could happen early late experiment. happens early,
large effect average delay, whereas happens late, effect smaller.
Deadlocking difficult measure quantitatively, progresses, driver agents
make reservations long periods timeso long, fact, overflow
memory computer running simulator. effect seen rough line
Figure 10(a). explore effects granularity, ran several experiments,
varying granularity well number lanes.

(a) Granularity 8

(b) Granularity 9

Figure 11: Increasing granularity always improve performance. 11(a),
granularity 8 suffices. 11(b), increasing granularity 9 actually hurts
performancevehicles traveling parallel (but opposite directions) competing middle row tiles.

4.2.1 Experimental Setup
experiments used prototype simulator described Section 4.1.1.
data point represents 500,000 steps simulation (approximately 2.5 hours simulated
time). traffic level fixed 0.2 vehicles per second.
4.2.2 Results
shown Figure 12, 2 lanes direction, 2 2 grid performs better
3 3 grid. Increasing 4 4 grid better 2 2, increasing 5 5
worse. increase granularity correspond decrease delay. However,
small granularities, incrementing granularity small even number small
odd number actually increases delay. case maximum delay, even granularity-2
618

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

0.14

3

0.12

2.5

0.1

Maximum Delay (s)

Average Delay (s)

system performs better granularity-5 system; ill effects odd granularities
shown Figure 11 tend slow unfortunate vehicles.

0.08
0.06
0.04

2

1.5

1

0.5

0.02
0

0
2

3

4

5

2

Granularity

3

4

5

Granularity

(a) Average delay

(b) Maximum delay

Figure 12: Simulation statistics FCFS policies varying granularity. 2
lanes direction traffic level 0.2 vehicles per second.
experiment run 500,000 simulation steps. Note increasing granularity always improve performance.
experiment suggests FCFS always run granularity high enough
vehicles never cross paths never compete reservation tiles.
Figure 13 shows, lanes require higher granularity (though even low granularity,
system out-performs traffic light). However, computational complexity
system increases proportional square granularity, granularity
increased indiscriminately.
4.3 Full Power FCFS
earlier experiments used prototype simulator, experiments use full power
FCFSturning, acceleration, modifications Section 3.4. vehicles
turn, thus always travel within line reservation tiles, increasing granularity
beyond twice number lanes improve performance even more. addition
FCFS, evaluate stop sign policy presented Section 3.2.
Technically, optimal delay individual vehicle delay all. However,
although vehicle could experience delay low 0 seconds, turning vehicles may need
slow avoid losing control. order create worthwhile benchmark
compare reservation system, empirically measure optimal average delay
intersection manager. this, use special control policy accepts requests.
deactivate vehicles ability detect vehicles, eliminating interactions
them. results presented optimal control policy,
optimal terms delay, provides safety guarantees.
Small intersections slow-moving traffic tend amenable control traffic
lights. light traffic usually regulate fairly effectively. example, consider
intersection stop signall vehicles must come stop, afterwards may proceed
619

fiDresner & Stone

6 Lanes
3 Lanes
2 Lanes
1 Lane

0.14

Average Delay (s)

0.12
0.1
0.08
0.06
0.04
0.02
0
1

2

6
Granularity

12

48

Figure 13: Average delays FCFS policy independently varying numbers lanes
granularity. Increasing granularity beyond twice number lanes
results marginal improvements. simulations run least
500,000 steps. 6 lanes 1 tile deadlocks overflows system memory
500,000 steps complete.

intersection clear. situations, stop sign often much efficient
traffic light, vehicles never stuck waiting light change
cross-traffic. protocol enables us define control policy, compare
experimentally policies. Note policy much efficient
actual stop sign, vehicle stopped intersection, driver agent
intersection determine car may safely proceed much precisely
much less conservatively human driver.
4.3.1 Experimental Setup
simulator simulates 3 lanes 4 cardinal directions. speed limit
lanes 25 meters per second. Every configuration shown run least 100,000 steps
simulator, corresponds approximately half hour simulated time. Vehicles
spawned turn probability 0.1, turning vehicles turn left right
equal probability. Vehicles turning right spawned right lane, whereas vehicles
turning left spawned left lane. Vehicles turning distributed
probabilistically amongst lanes traffic lane equal possible.
FCFS stop sign (implemented extension FCFSsee Section 3.5)
granularity 24.
4.3.2 Results
results experiments shown Figure 14. expected, average delay
optimal system positive nonzero, small.
620

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

FCFS performs well, nearly matching performance optimal policy.
higher levels traffic, average delay vehicle gets high 0.35 seconds,
never 1 second optimal. none tested conditions FCFS
even approach delay traffic light system previous experiment, shown
Figure 10(a).
stop sign perform well FCFS, low amounts traffic,
still performs fairly well, average delay 3 seconds greater optimal.
However, traffic level increases, performance degrades. difficult imagine
scenario implementation stop sign would actually usedit requires
technology reservation system, advantages
FCFS.
5
4.5

Stop Sign

4
3.5
Delay (s)

Traffic Light Minimum
3
2.5
2
1.5
1

Optimal

0.5

FCFS

0
0

0.5

1

1.5

2

2.5

Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

Figure 14: Delays varying amounts traffic FCFS, stop sign, optimal
system.

4.4 Allowing Turns Lane
traditional traffic systems, especially traffic lights, vehicles wishing turn
onto cross street must specially designated turning lanes. helps prevent
cars want turn holding non-turning traffic. However, system
reservation system, restriction longer necessary. nothing inherent
reservation system demands vehicles turn specific lane. Investigating
effects allowing turning lane produced surprising results. seen
Figure 15, relaxing restriction actually hurts FCFSs performance slightly. one
621

fiDresner & Stone

might think allows vehicles flexibility, average increases resources
used one turning vehicle. making left turns left lane right turns
right lane, vehicles travel shorter distance reserve reservation tiles
less heavily used. However, experiments may misleading. Vehicles changing
lanes get designated turn lane could potentially delay vehicles behind
process. currently model lane changing intersection,
able experimentally verify conjecture.
1
Fixed Lane
Lane

Delay (s)

0.8

0.6

0.4

0.2

0
0

0.5

1
1.5
Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

2

2.5

Figure 15: Comparison FCFS policy traditional turns one allowing turning
lane. Allowing turns lane decreases performance slightly,
producing longer delays.

4.5 Effects Human Interoperability
Section 4.3, showed vehicles autonomous, intersection-associated
delays reduced dramatically. following experiments suggest stronger result:
using two light models presented Section 3.6.2, delays reduced stage
adoption. Furthermore, additional incentives exist stage drivers switch
autonomous vehicles.
4.5.1 Experimental Setup
experiments, simulator models 3 lanes 4 cardinal directions.
speed limit lanes 25 meters per second. intersection control policy
reservation tiles, granularity 24. simulator spawns vehicles turning left
left lane, vehicles turning right right lane, vehicles traveling straight
622

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

center lane1 . Unless otherwise specified, data point represents 180000 time steps,
one hour simulated time. simulated human-driven vehicles use two-second
following distance, use lane-following algorithm autonomous drivers.
employ point-of-no-return mechanism reacting lightsif vehicle
stop yellow red light, does, otherwise proceeds.
4.5.2 Results
present experimental results human-compatible policies two parts.
first focuses policies facilitate smooth transition all-autonomous
mostly-autonomous vehicle system. second focuses incentives throughout
process, global individual, continue deployment system. Combined,
results suggest incremental deployment (one desiderata) technically
possible desirable.
Transition Full Deployment purpose hybrid intersection control policy
confer benefits autonomy passengers driver-agent controlled vehicles
still allowing human users participate system. Figure 16 shows smooth
monotonically improving transition modern-day traffic lights (represented
Traffic-Light policy) completely mostly autonomous vehicle mechanism (FCFSLight Single-Lane light model). early stages (100%-10% human), AllLanes light model used. Later (less 10% human), Single-Lane light model
introduced. change (both driver populations light models), delays
decreased. Notice rather drastic drop delay FCFS-Light All-Lanes
light model FCFS-Light Single-Lane light model. Although none
results quite close minimum pure FCFS, Single-Lane light model
allows greater use intersection FCFS portion FCFS-Light policy,
translates higher efficiency lower delay.
systems significant proportion human drivers, All-Lanes light model
works wellhuman drivers experience would Traffic-Light
policy, autonomous driver agents extra opportunities make
intersection. small amount benefit passed human drivers, may
find closer front lane waiting red light turn green.
explore much average vehicle would benefit, ran simulator FCFSLight policy, All-Lanes light model, 100%, 50%, 10% rate human drivers.
means vehicle spawned, receives human driver (instead driver
agent) probability 1, .5, .1 respectively. seen Figure 17, proportion
human drivers decreases, delay experienced average driver decreases.
decreases large brought Single-Lane light model,
least possible significant numbers human drivers.
Incentives Individuals Even without sort autonomous intersection control
mechanism, incentives humans switch autonomous vehicles.
1. constraint likely relax future. included work give Single-Lane
light model flexibility fair comparison FCFS policy, performs even better
absence.

623

fiDresner & Stone

60

50

5% Human

Delay (s)

40

30
100% Human
20
1% Human

10% Human
10

Fully Autonomous
0
0

0.5

1
1.5
Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

2

2.5

Figure 16: Average delays vehicles function traffic level FCFS-Light
two different light models: All-Lanes light model, well-suited
high percentages human-driven vehicles, Single-Lane light model,
works well relatively human-driven vehicles. adoption
autonomous vehicles increases, average delays decrease.

20

Delay (s)

15

10

5
TRAFFIC-LIGHT
FCFS-LIGHT 50% Human
FCFS-LIGHT 10% Human
0
0

0.25

0.5
Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

0.75

1

Figure 17: Average delays vehicles function traffic level FCFS-Light
All-Lanes light model. Shown results 100%, 50%,
10% human-driven vehicles. 100% case equivalent Traffic-Light
policy. Note average delay decreases percentage human-driven
vehicles decreases.

driving, well myriad safety benefits strong incentives promote
autonomous vehicles marketplace. experimental results suggest additional incentives. Using reservation system, autonomous vehicles experience lower average delays
human-driven vehicles difference increases autonomous vehicles become
prevalent.
Figure 18 shows average delays human drivers compared autonomous driver
agents FCFS-Light policy using All-Lanes light model. experiment,
half drivers human. Humans experience slightly longer delays autonomous
vehicles, worse Traffic-Light policy. Thus, putting
624

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

autonomous vehicles road, drivers experience equal smaller delays compared
current situation. expected autonomous driver everything
human driver more.
35
Humans
Autonomous
30

Delay (s)

25
20
15
10
5
0
0

0.25

0.5
Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

0.75

1

Figure 18: Average delays human-driven vehicles vehicles function traffic
level FCFS-Light All-Lanes light model. experiment,
50% vehicles human driven. Autonomous vehicles experience slightly
lower delays across board, human drivers experience delays worse
Traffic-Light policy.

reservation system widespread use autonomous vehicles make
vast majority road, door opened even efficient light
model FCFS-Light policy. low concentration human drivers,
Single-Lane light model drastically reduce delays, even levels overall traffic
Traffic-Light policy handle. Using light model, autonomous drivers
pass red lights even frequently fewer tiles off-limits given
time. Figure 19 compare delays experienced autonomous drivers
human drivers 5% drivers human thus Single-Lane light model
used. improvements using All-Lanes light model benefit drivers
extent, Single-Lane light models sharp decrease average delays (Figure 16)
comes high price human drivers.
shown Figure 19, human drivers experience much higher delays average.
lower traffic levels, delays even higher associated TrafficLight policy. Figure 16 shows despite this, high levels traffic, human drivers
benefit relative Traffic-Light. Additionally, intersections using FCFS-Light still
able handle far traffic using Traffic-Light.
SingleLane light model effectively gives humans high, fairly constant
delay. green light one lane comes around lane
green light, human-driven vehicle may find sitting red light time
light changes. However, since light model would put operation
human drivers fairly scarce, huge benefit 95% 99% vehicles
far outweighs cost. light model detects reacts presence human
625

fiDresner & Stone

60
Humans
Autonomous
50

Delay (s)

40

30

20

10

0
0

0.25

0.5
Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

0.75

1

Figure 19: Average delays human-driven vehicles vehicles function traffic
level FCFS-Light Single-Lane light model. Humans experience
worse delay Traffic-Light, average delay vehicles much
lower. experiment, 5% vehicles human-driven.

drivers might able achieve even better overall performance, without causing human
drivers wait long.
data suggest incentive early adopters (persons
purchasing vehicles capable interacting reservation system) cities
towns. properly equipped vehicles get going faster (not
mention safely). Cities towns equip intersections utilize
reservation paradigm experience fewer traffic jams efficient use roadways
(along fewer collisions less wasted gasoline). penalty
human drivers (which would presumably majority point), would
reason party involved oppose introduction system. Later,
drivers made transition autonomous vehicles, Single-Lane light
model introduced, incentive move new technology increasedboth
cities individuals. time, autonomous vehicle owners far outnumber human
drivers, still benefit traffic worst.
4.6 Emergency Vehicle Experiments
already shown FCFS significantly reduce average delays
vehicles, FCFS-Emerg helps reduce delays emergency vehicles even further.
4.6.1 Experimental Setup
demonstrate improvement, ran simulator varying amounts traffic,
keeping proportion emergency vehicles fixed 0.1% (that is, spawned vehicle
made emergency vehicle probability 0.001). small number
emergency vehicles created realistically low proportions, ran configuration
(data point) 100 hours simulated timemuch longer experiments.
626

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

4.6.2 Results
shown Figure 20, emergency vehicles average experience lower delays
normal vehicles. amount emergency vehicles outperform normal
vehicles increases traffic increases, suggesting designed, FCFS-Emerg helps
traffic contending space-time intersection.
10

Delay (s)

8

6

4

2
Vehicles
Emergency Vehicles
0
0

1

2
3
Traffic Level (vehicles/s)

4

5

Figure 20: Average delays vehicles emergency vehicles function traffic
level FCFS-Emerg policy. One thousand vehicles (on average)
emergency vehicle. Delays emergency vehicles lower data
points.

5. Performance Failure Modes
Fully autonomous vehicles promise enormous gains safety, efficiency, economy
transportation. However, gains realized, plethora safety reliability concerns must addressed. previous sections, assumed
vehicles perform without gross malfunctions. section, relax assumption
demonstrate reservation-based mechanism reacts scenarios malfunctions occur. Additionally, intentionally disable elements system order
investigate necessity efficacy.
5.1 Causes Accidents
collision purely autonomous traffic number causes, including software
errors driver agent, physical malfunction vehicle, even meteorological
phenomena. modern-day traffic, factors largely ignored two reasons. First,
exclusively human-populated system, generous margins error,
sensitive small moderate aberrations. Second, none significant
respect driver error causes accidents (Wierwille, Hanowski, Hankey, Kieliszewski,
Lee, Medina, Keisler, & Dingus, 2002). However, future infallible autonomous
driver agents, exactly issues prevalent causes automobile
collisions. safety allowances explained Sections 3.4.5 3.4.6 adjustablegiven
maximum allowable error vehicle positioning, buffers extended handle
627

fiDresner & Stone

errorbut reasonable adjustment account gross mechanical malfunction
blowout failed brakes. types issues infrequent, believe safety
intersection control mechanism acceptable even individual occurrences
slightly worse accidents today.
5.2 Adding Safety Net
One easily imagine badly accident efficient system could without
reactive safety measures place. Here, explain system deals
rare, dangerous events. show Section 5.3, disabling safety measures
leaves system prone spectacular failure modes, sometimes involving dozens vehicles.
Intact, measures make events much manageable.
5.2.1 Assumptions
Section 5.3, show reactive safety measures reduce average number
vehicles involved crash dozens one two. However, order employ
safety measures fully, must make additional assumptions.
Detecting Problem First, assume intersection manager able detect
something gone wrong. certainly non-trivial assumption, without
it, substantial mitigation possible. Simply put, intersection manager cannot react
something cannot detect. two basic ways intersection manager
could detect vehicle encountered sort problem: vehicle inform
intersection manager, intersection manager detect vehicle directly.
instance, event collision, device similar triggers airbag
send signal intersection manager. Devices already exist aircraft emit
distress signals locator beacons event crash. intersection manager
might notice less severe problem, vehicle supposed be,
using cameras sensors intersection. However, method detection likely
much slower react problem. advantages disadvantages,
combination two would likely safest. specifics implementation
beyond scope analysis. important whenever vehicle violates
reservation way, intersection manager become aware soon possible.
simulations deal collisions, assume colliding vehicle sends
signal intersection manager becomes aware situation immediately.
described Appendix B, protocol includes Done message vehicles transmit complete reservations. One way reliably sense vehicle
distress would notice missing Done message. approach two drawbacks.
First, Done message optional, mainly incentive driver
agent transmit it. Second, intersection manager may able notice missing message time incident occurred. intend investigate
alternative future work.
Informing Vehicles assume exists way intersection
manager broadcast fact something wrong vehicles. Since intersection manager already communicate vehicles, big assumption.
628

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

However, mode communication bit different employed rest
communication protocol (see Appendix B). normal operating conditions, individual
messages containing multiple pieces information transmitted agents.
cannot verify receipt messages without response, semantics
protocol ensure whenever message sent, sending agent makes conservative assumptionin case Request message, received;
case Confirm message, was. event collision, however, intersection
manager needs communicate one bit information many vehicles possible:
something wrong. important vehicles receive message,
transmitted repeatedly, vehicles, exclusion messages.
would assume vehicles receive message, show Section 5.3
even significant number vehicles not, safety measures place still protect
many vehicles would otherwise wind crashing.
5.2.2 Incident Mitigation
vehicle deviates significantly planned course intersection resulting physical harm vehicle presumed occupants, refer situation
incident. incident occurred, first priority ensure safety
persons vehicles nearby. expect incidents infrequent
occurrences, re-establishing normal operation intersection lower priority
optimization process left future work.
Intersection Manager Response soon intersection manager detects
notified incident, immediately stops granting reservations. subsequent received
requests rejected without consideration. Due nature protocol, intersection manager cannot revoke reservations, driver agents would incentive
acknowledge receipt. However, intersection manager send message
vehicles incident occurred. message special Emergency-Stop message, intersection manager may send emergency situation,
(as rest protocol) must assume received.
Emergency-Stop message lets vehicles know event taken place
intersection that:
reservations accepted
vehicles able come stop entering intersection
vehicles intersection longer assume near misses result
collisions
human-compatible policies, FCFS-Light, intersection manager
turns lights red. real-world implementation, conspicuous visual cue could
provided, semantically important intersection informs human
drivers may enter.
Vehicle Response Emergency-Stop message useful way, driver
agents must react it. explain specific actions implementation driver
agent takes receives message. Normally, approaching intersection,
driver agent ignores vehicles sensed intersection. might
otherwise appear imminent collision open road almost certainly precisely
629

fiDresner & Stone

coordinated near-miss intersection. However, driver agent receives
Emergency-Stop message intersection manager, disables behavior.
vehicle intersection, driver agent blindly drive another vehicle
help it. vehicle intersection stop time, enter,
even reservation.
first inclination make driver agent immediately decelerate
stop, quickly realized safest behavior. vehicles receive
message come stop, vehicles would otherwise cleared intersection without
colliding may find stuck intersectionanother object vehicles
run into. especially true vehicle caused incident edge
intersection unlikely hit. Trying stop vehicles
intersection makes situation worse.
driver agent detect impending collision, take evasive actions
apply brakes. Since true multiagent system self-interested agents,
cannot prevent driver agents so, even detrimental vehicles overall.
Thus, driver agent brakes believes collision imminent.
5.3 Experiments
order evaluate effects reactive safety measures, performed several experiments various components intentionally disabled. various configurations
separated three classes. oblivious intersection manager takes action
upon detecting incident. intersection manager utilizing passive safety measures stops
accepting reservations, send Emergency-Stop messages nearby driver
agents. Finally, active configuration intersection managerwhich corresponds
full version protocol specified Appendix Bhas safety features
place. addition considering three incarnations intersection manager,
study effects unreliable communication active case. Note
vehicles receive Emergency-Stop message, active passive configurations
identical.
5.3.1 Experimental Setup
great efficiency reservation-based system comes extreme sensitivity
error. buffering might protect minute discrepancies, cannot hope cover
gross mechanical malfunctions. determine much effect malfunction
would have, created simulation individual vehicles could crashed, causing
immediately stop remain stopped. Whenever vehicle crashed
comes contact one is, becomes crashed well. model
specifics individual impacts, allow us estimate malfunction might
lead collisions.
order ensure included malfunctions different parts intersection,
triggered incident choosing random (x, y) coordinate pair inside intersection, crashing first vehicle cross either x coordinate. akin
creating two infinitesimally thin walls, one horizontal vertical, intersect
(x, y). Figure 21 provides visual depiction process.
630

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Figure 21: Triggering incident intersection simulator. dark vehicle turning
left crashed crossed randomly chosen x coordinate. different vehicle crossed x coordinate randomly chosen coordinate
earlier, would crashed instead.

initiating incident, ran simulator additional 60 seconds, observing
subsequent collisions recording occurred. Using information,
constructed crash log, essentially histogram crashed vehicles. step
remaining simulation, crash log indicates many vehicles crashed
step. averaging many crash logs configuration, able
construct average crash log, gives picture typical incident would
produce.
system compatible humans, included experiments humancompatible intersection control policy. demonstrated Section 4.5, significant
number human drivers present, FCFS-Light cannot offer much performance
benefit traditional traffic light systems. such, limited experimentation
scenarios 5% vehicles controlled simulated human drivers, used
Single-Lane light model (see Section 3.6.2). 5% human drivers, FCFSLight policy still create lot precarious situations focus
investigation.
experiments, ran simulator scenarios 3, 4, 5, 6 lanes
four cardinal directions, although discuss results 3-
6-lane cases (other results similar) sake brevity. earlier experiments,
vehicles spawned equally likely directions, generated via Poisson process
controlled probability vehicle generated step. Vehicles
generated set destination15% vehicles turn left, 15% turn right,
remaining 70% go straight. before, leftmost lane always left turn lane,
right lane always right turn lane. Turning vehicles always spawned correct
lane, non-turning vehicles spawned turn lanes. scenarios involving
autonomous vehicles, set traffic level average 1.667 vehicles per second per
lane direction. equates 5 total vehicles per second 3 lanes, 10 total
631

fiDresner & Stone

vehicles per second 6 lanes. Scenarios human-driven vehicles one third
traffic fully autonomous scenariosthe intersection cannot nearly efficient
human drivers present. chose amounts traffic toward high end
spectrum manageable traffic respective variants intersection manager.
wanted traffic flowing smoothly, wanted intersection full
vehicles test situations likely lead destructive possible collisions.
5.3.2 Bad It?
suspected, average crash log oblivious intersection manager quite grisly.
explained Section 5.2.2, driver agents must ignore sensors intersection, many close calls would appear impending collisions. Without
way react situation going awry, vehicles careen intersection, piling
entire intersection filled crashed vehicles protrude incoming lanes.
Figure 22 shows 6-lane casesfully autonomous 5% human driversthe
rate collisions abate 70 vehicles crashed. Even full 60 seconds
incident begins, vehicles still colliding. 3-lane case, intersection
much smaller thus fills much rapidly; 50 seconds, number collided
vehicles levels off.
100

60
6 Lanes
3 Lanes

90

6 Lanes
3 Lanes
50

80

Cars Crashed

Cars Crashed

70
60
50
40

40

30

20

30
20

10

10
0

10

20

30

40

50

60

0

Time (s)

10

20

30

40

50

60

Time (s)

(a) autonomous

(b) 5% humans

Figure 22: Average crash logs (with 95% confidence interval) 3- 6-lane oblivious
intersections. 22(a), intersection manages autonomous vehicles,
22(b) includes 5% human drivers.

scenarios human drivers, shown Figure 22(b), number vehicles involved average incident noticeably smaller. outcome likely result
two factors. First foremost, FCFS-Light policy must make broad allowances
accommodate human drivers, thus overall inherently less dangerous.
characteristic close calls standard FCFS policy less common. Second,
simulated human driver agents drive blindly intersectiontrusting
intersection managerthe way autonomous vehicles do. note Figure 22(b)
visible periodicity light model portion policy. paths open
632

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

autonomous vehicles due changes lights, drive unwittingly growing
mass crashed cars.
5.3.3 Reducing Number Collisions
two main components safety mechanism introduced Section 5.2. First,
intersection manager stops accepting reservations. Second, intersection manager
sends messages informing driver agents incident taken place.
possibility second part might always work perfectly; vehicles might
receive message. investigate effects potential communication failures,
intentionally disabled vehicles ability receive Emergency-Stop
message. parameter simulator controls fraction vehicles created
property, varying parameter, could observe subsequent effect
average number vehicles involved incidents.
compared oblivious intersection manager, number vehicles involved
average incident active intersection manager decreases dramatically. Table 1
shows numerical results 3- 6-lane intersections, along 95%
confidence interval. average crash logs runs shown Figure 22,
would indistinguishable one another scale. Instead, present
Figure 23.

Oblivious
Passive
Active
20% receiving
40% receiving
60% receiving
80% receiving
100% receiving

Fully Autonomous
3 Lanes
6 Lanes
27.9 1.3 90.9 4.9
2.63 .13 3.23 .16

5% Human
3 Lanes
6 Lanes
19.3 1.1 49.3 2.7
2.23 .10 2.35 .13

2.44 .13
2.28 .12
1.89 .10
1.71 .08
1.36 .06

2.07 .10
1.91 .10
1.72 .09
1.46 .07
1.22 .05

3.15 .17
2.90 .16
2.69 .15
2.30 .13
1.77 .10

2.29 .13
2.07 .12
1.98 .11
1.65 .09
1.50 .09

Table 1: Average number simulated vehicles involved incidents 3- 6-lane intersections. Even passive safety measures, number crashed
vehicles dramatically decreased oblivious intersection manager.
active configuration, vehicles receive emergency signal, number
crashed vehicles decreases further.
Figure 23 shows effects reactive safety measures intersections 6 lanes,
proportion receiving vehicles varying 0% (passive) 100% increments
20%. Even passive configuration, overall number vehicles involved
average incident decreases factor almost 30 fully autonomous scenario,
factor 20 scenario 5% human drivers, compared oblivious
intersection manager. expected active configuration, vehicles receive
emergency signal, fewer wind crashing. graphs Figure 23 show first
633

fiDresner & Stone

15 seconds incident, case collision occur 15 seconds
incident started.
3.5

2.4
Passive
20% receiving
40% receiving
60% receiving
80% receiving
100% receiving

2
Cars Crashed

Cars Crashed

3

Passive
20% receiving
40% receiving
60% receiving
80% receiving
100% receiving

2.2

2.5

2

1.8
1.6
1.4

1.5
1.2
1

1
0

2

4

6

8

10

12

14

0

Time (s)

2

4

6

8

10

12

14

Time (s)

(a) autonomous

(b) 5% humans

Figure 23: first 15 seconds average crash logs 6-lane passive active intersections. vehicles react signal, safety improves.

5.3.4 Reducing Severity Collisions
reassuring know number vehicles involved average incident
kept fairly low, data give entire picture. example, compare
incident 30 vehicles lose hubcap one two vehicles completely
destroyed occupants killed. currently plans model
intricate physics individual collision high fidelity, simulations allow us
observe velocity collisions occur. previous example, might
notice 30 vehicles bumped one another low velocities, two
vehicles traveling full speed. quantify information, record
collision happens, velocity happens. collision, amount
damage done approximately proportional amount kinetic energy lost.
kinetic energy proportional square velocity, use running total
squares crash velocities create rough estimate amount damage
caused incident. Figure 24 shows average damage log 6-lane intersection
autonomous vehicles. Qualitatively similar results found intersection
types.
Figure 24(a) shows, effect safety measures metric quite
dramatic well. passive case total accumulated squared velocity decreases
factor 25. active case, vehicles receiving signal, decreases
another factor 2. particular note zoomed-in graph Figure 24(b).
passive configuration, total squared velocity accumulates intersection manager
oblivious, first vehicles stop short intersection around 3 seconds;
without reservation, may enter. active scenario, vehicles
receive message, improvement almost immediate.
634

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

1800
Oblivious
Passive
Active

2 2

25000

Accumulated Squared Velocity (m /s )

2 2

Accumulated Squared Velocity (m /s )

30000

20000

15000

10000

5000

0

Oblivious
Passive
Active

1600
1400
1200
1000
800
600
400
200

0

10

20

30

40

50

60

0

1

2

3

Time (s)

4

5

6

7

Time (s)

(a) average incident

(b) zoomed

Figure 24: Average total squared velocity crashed vehicles 6-lane intersection
autonomous vehicles. Sending emergency message vehicles
causes fewer collisions, makes collisions happen less dangerous.

5.3.5 Delayed Incident Detection
Implicit results assumption intersection managers become aware
incidents instantaneously. could case many collisionsvehicles
communicate collidedif vehicles communications faulty,
vehicle realize collided, intersection may discover problem
seconds, another vehicle sensor detect problem. assess effects
delayed incident detection, artificially delayed intersection managers response
simulations. Figure 25 shows results experiments.
4

5
Number crashed vehicles

Number crashed vehicles

5s delay
3.5
3

3s delay

2.5
1s delay

2

delay

1.5
1

4.5
g

vin

ei

4
%

3.5

,0

ay

3

5s

l
de

c


g

2s delay, 50% receivin

2.5
2
1.5
1

0

2

4

6

8

10

0

Time (s)

2

4

6

8

10

Time (s)

(a) delaying detection

(b) delays faulty communication

Figure 25: Crash logs showing effects delayed incident detection.
Figure 25(a), intersection managers reaction delayed 0, 1, 3, 5 seconds.
Note total number crashed vehicles delay 5 seconds par
number experiment intersection manager reacts immediately, none
635

fiDresner & Stone

vehicles receive message, shown Figure 23(a). Figure 25(b) shows happens
delayed detection faulty communication. graph, along earlier
results, suggests small values, second delay approximately equivalent
20% vehicles receiving Emergency-Stop message, combined,
delayed detection faulty communication additive effect. larger delays,
number vehicles involved approximated using data shown Figure 22(a),
cases, number vehicles crash intersection much
smaller number crash reacts.
5.4 Safety Discussion
results section suggest may possible improve efficiency
improving safety. course deployment real world, extensive testing
real vehicles would needed order verify suggested efficiency benefits,
well safety properties system. People often hesitant put wellbeing (physical otherwise) hands computer unless convinced
receive significant safety benefit exchange surrendering precious control.
Humans often suffer overconfidence effect, erroneously believing
skillful others. 1981 survey Swedish drivers, respondents asked rate
driving ability relation others. full 80% asked placed
top 30% drivers (Svenson, 1981). effect creates high standard
computerized systems held. insufficient systems marginally
safer, safer average user; must paragon safety.
experiments, showed number vehicles involved individual incidents drastically reduced utilizing fairly straightforward reactive safety mechanism. fact, active configuration 3 lanes, 75% incidents involved
one vehicle: one intentionally crashed (60% 6 lanes). Even passive case
6 lanes traffic, average 3.23 vehicles involved.
compare current systems? conservatively assume accidents traffic today
involve one vehicle, represents 223% increase per occurrence. Thus,
things equal, frequency accidents reduced 70%, experiments
suggest autonomous intersection management system safer overall. 2002
report U.S. Federal Highway Administration blamed 95% accidents
driver error (Wierwille et al., 2002). remaining accidents divided equally
vehicle failures problems roads. important note numbers
driving, intersection driving. Accidents intersections even likely
caused driver error, sometimes even drivers willfully disobeying law: running
red lights stop signs making illegal U-turns.
Even make overly conservative assumptionsthat driving dangerous intersection driving, driver error accountable intersection crashes
types drivingour data suggest automobile traffic autonomous
driver agents intersection control mechanism reduce collisions intersections 80%. believe reality, improvement much greater.
safety measures presented section constitute one approach mitigating
systems failure modes. sophisticated methods involving explicit cooperation
636

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

amongst vehicles may create even safer system. shown (or attempted
show) particular solution best possible. Rather demonstrated
even simple straightforward response accidents, overall safety
system maintained, without sacrificing benefits vastly improved efficiency.

6. Related Work
Traffic control vast area research computer scientists engineers alike. field
Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) concerned applying information, computing, sensor technologies solve problems traffic road management (Bishop,
2005). includes intelligent vehicles (IV) well infrastructure, intersections. Unfortunately, aspects heavily studied, relatively little current
research considers intelligent autonomous vehicles infrastructure work together improve efficiency safety overall traffic system. Berkeley
PATH project produced lot interesting work, including work fully-automated
highway (Alvarez & Horowitz, 1997).
section, describe work related own, directly tangentially. work specifically concerned intersection control, takes
multiagent approach aspects traffic management, represents work
technologies necessary bring fully autonomous vehicles mainstream.
6.1 Requisite Technology
autonomous vehicles take roads, need able interact
aspects roadways, including pedestrians, vehicles, lanes. early
1991, driver agent system named Ulysses developed simulation (Reece
& Shafer, 1991). systems currently development implementation
real vehicles geared toward assisting human drivers, many technologies created
efforts applicable creation completely autonomous driver
agent. successful driver agent needs three main things: detect entities
road, keep vehicle lane, maintain safe distances vehicles.
Fortunately, three subtasks currently attracts extensive amount research.
6.1.1 Object Detection Tracking
fully autonomous vehicle must able reliably detect, classify, track various objects
may roadway. pedestrians bicycles cars trucks, autonomous
vehicles require robust sensors monitor world around manner
lighting conditions weather. Without abilities, amount higher reasoning
driver agent irrelevant. Fortunately, researchers attacking problem
many techniques.
2004, Honda introduced intelligent night vision system Japanese market
capable detecting pedestrians (Liu & Fujimura, 2003). system uses two far-IR
(FIR) cameras front vehicle detect heat-emitting objects beyond range
illuminated vehicles headlights. two cameras allow system obtain distance
information detected pedestrians warn driver. DaimlerChrysler
637

fiDresner & Stone

developing similar system extrapolates trajectories classified objects
order predict possible outcomes sooner (Gavrila, Giebel, & Munder, 2004). Mahlisch
et al. (2005) developed sensor fusion technique glean information
pedestrians reliably even low-resolution images.
Ford Motor Company investigating track vehicles using color
shape information (She, Bebis, Gu, & Miller, 2004). Gepperth et al. (2005)
demonstrated gray-valued videos (no color), two-stage (initial detection
confirmation) mechanism using simple neural network confirmation reliably
quickly classify vehicles.
Vehicle pedestrian classification tracking well-studied area IV research
progressing quickly. glance IV-related conference symposium reveal
plethora articles aimed using lidar, FIR, normal video, combination
sensors algorithms Kalman filters, particle filters, neural networks track
classify objects road.
6.1.2 Lane Following
pedestrian vehicle detection tracking, lane following heavily studied area IV research. Varying passive lane- road-departure warning systems
(LDWS/RDWS) active lane keeping assistance (LKA), many systems already showing production vehicles.
far RDWS go, Kohl et al. (2006) used neuroevolution create warning
system warn drivers road departure impending crashes
vehicles. system tested simulation robotic vehicle. work
sponsored Toyota, currently LDWS market Japan.
system unique uses rear-facing camera predict warn impending lane
departures. LDWS RDWS promise extensive benefits drivers, warn
imminent road lane departures, provide information specific
action taken. Autonomous vehicles need ensure reach point
lane road departure imminent.
Lane keeping, hand, provides executes actions. example,
Hands Across America project 1995 drove vehicle 2,849 miles Pittsburgh Los
Angeles. 98.2% journey, vehicle steered (Pomerleau, 1993). recent
projects concentrated making systems robust varying speed, inclement
weather poor lighting conditions beneath overpasses tunnels. Wu et
al. (2005) proposed tested vision-based lane-keeping system operate
varying speed providing smooth human-like steering. Watanabe Nishida (2005),
working Toyota, developed lane detection algorithm specifically designed
steering assistance systems extremely robust varying road conditions lighting.
several LKA systems market Japan, systems intended
allow autonomous driving. Rather, attempt reduce driver fatigue make
turning stable (Bishop, 2005). Production systems allow autonomous steering
almost invariably based specially painted lines limited special vehicles
closed courses.
638

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Even without benefit explicitly designated lanes, autonomous vehicles keep
roadway. 2005 DARPA Grand Challenge (DARPA, 2007),
winning vehicle, Stanley, used technique fusing short-range laser range finders
long-range video cameras follow rough dirt path. First, vehicle found smooth areas
front using laser range finders. mapped information onto video
images forward-facing cameras. determining color area image
corresponding smooth areas found laser range finder, Stanley able
extrapolate using flood-fill-type algorithm find areas video image
dirt path (NOVA, 2006). Ramstrom Christensen (2005) achieved similar goal
using strategy based probabilistic generative model.
6.1.3 Adaptive Cruise Control
lane-keeping systems represent main lateral component autonomous vehicles
driver agent, adaptive cruise control (ACC) main longitudinal component. ACC
allows vehicle maintain safe following distance react quicker human
driver case sudden deceleration vehicle front. ACC systems already
available marketDaimlerChryslers Mercedes-Benz S-class, example, comes
system automatically apply brake detects driver slowing
sufficiently fast. Jaguar, Honda, BMW offer similar systems. Nissan Toyota
recently begun offering low-speed following systems, follow vehicles
slower, denser, urban traffic scenarios (Bishop, 2005). ACC relies robust sensing
uses radar, lidar, traditional machine vision algorithms. combining various flavors
ACC low speed, high speed, etc.an agent could control longitudinal motion
vehicle situations. Recently, notion cooperative adaptive cruise control (CACC)
emerged (Laumonier, Desjardins, & Chaib-draa, 2006). concept goes much
toward realizing goal fully autonomous vehicles. allowing vehicles collaborate
take advantage precision autonomous driver agents, vehicles use
existing road space much efficiently.
6.2 Intersection Collision Avoidance
date, much work relating intersections focused Intersection Collision
Avoidance (ICA). work seeks warn driver vehicle may entering
intersection unsafely. aid high-precision digital maps GPS equipment,
vehicle detects classifies state traditional signaling systems placed
intersection (Lindner, Kressel, & Kaelberer, 2004). ICA systems typically take
action behalf driver, simply provide visual auditory warning.
Rasche Naumann (1997, 1998, 1997) worked extensively decentralized solutions intersection collision avoidance problems, including involving autonomous
vehicles. work similar uses potential points collision
restrict access intersection. one vehicle may occupy potential point
collision time. Vehicles attempt obtain token (similar token-ring computer networking) point needed cross intersection. vehicle
necessary tokens, may cross. Rasche Naumanns system includes priority
model allows emergency vehicles cross quickly prevents deadlocks amongst
639

fiDresner & Stone

normal vehicles. However, system fails satisfy several desiderata.
make guarantees, authors provide results regarding efficiency
system compared traditional system. Furthermore, distributed algorithm
shown resilient unreliable communication. authors provide
insight system could adapted work mixed human/autonomous
vehicle population. striking difference, however, mechanism
seem notion planning ahead. Tokens potential points collision
either taken takena vehicle seek obtain token point
future, thus allowing proceed toward intersection without slowing
vehicles tokens.
context video games animation, Reynolds (1999) developed autonomous steering algorithms attempt avoid collisions intersections
signaling mechanisms. system would enormous advantage
requiring special infrastructure agent intersectionvehicles equipped
algorithms could operate intersection. Unfortunately, two main drawbacks
system make unsuitable use real-life traffic. First, algorithm
let agent choose path take intersection; vehicle may even find
exiting intersection way came in, due efforts avoid colliding
vehicles. Second, algorithm attempts avoid collisionsit make
guarantees safety.
Cooperative intersection collision avoidance form cooperative vehicle-highway system (CVHS) intersection allowed participate ICA problem. ICA
systems contained entirely individual vehicles cannot account gaps sensor views
sources incomplete information. Thus, CVHS approach required.
many technologies, production systems still assume human driver attempt
warn violation occur, cases, punish
fact, cameras detect vehicle run red light automatically
issues driver citation. U.S. Department Transportation sponsoring several ICA projects including infrastructure-only cooperative approaches (USDOT,
2003). intention first deploy infrastructure-only systems,
market penetration ICA-equipped vehicles increases, roll cooperative systems.
Significant work ICA underway Japan (Bishop, 2005).
systems large step toward enabling autonomous vehicles take
roads, none designed work specifically autonomous vehicles. exception
algorithm designed games, assumes human driver traditional
signaling systemsa clumsy, inefficient interface find obsolete due
autonomous vehicle technology.
6.3 Optimizing Traffic Signal Timing
vast majority deployed technology intersection control involves calibrating
timing traditional traffic lights order create wave green vehicles
reach one green light, continue subsequent intersections without
stop. Unfortunately, practice, waves tend sporadic short-lived due
640

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

rapidly changing traffic patterns. However, offer substantial benefits compared
systems without coordination.
TRANSYT, Traffic Network Study Tool, off-line system that, given average
traffic flows, determine optimum fixed-time coordinated traffic signal timings (Robertson, 1969). TRANSYT requires extensive data gathering analysis, used
heavily world. Unfortunately, system brittle
ability react unusual changes traffic flow. example, end
major sporting event, thousands vehicles may attempting cross intersection
direction normal circumstances rarely used. light timings
set reflect normal circumstances, length time departing
vehicles get green light may significantly less cross traffic, may
little.
SCOOT, Split, Cycle, Offset Optimisation Technique, represents advancement TRANSYT (Hunt, Robertson, Bretherton, & Winton, 1981). SCOOT
on-line adaptive traffic control system react changes traffic levels, give priority vehicles buses, even estimate vehicle emissions. SCOOT
shown reduce traffic delays average 20% systems TRANSYT, still
relies traditional signaling systems vehicles. Furthermore, SCOOT requires reliable
traffic data order adapt, thus may slow react changes traffic flow.
6.4 MAS Traffic
Automobile traffic great example multiagent system, surprising
lot research modelling studying traffic using multiagent techniques.
Many approaches consider systems consisting traffic-light-controlling agents
driver agents, opposed heterogeneous multiagent system many kinds
agents. Nevertheless, many ideas involved could potentially adapted work
within framework reservation system.
6.4.1 Cooperative Traffic Signals
Much MAS traffic research focuses improving current technology (systems traffic
lights). example, Roozemond (1999) allows intersections act autonomously
sharing data gather. intersections use information make
short- long-term predictions traffic adjust accordingly. strategy
attempts overcome one weaknesses SCOOT: need large amounts
reliable traffic data. multiple intersections share data, intersection get
accurate picture current traffic situation.
Bazzan (2005) used decentralized approach combining MAS evolutionary
game theory. approach models intersection individually-motivated agent
must focus local goals (getting vehicles intersection),
global goals (reducing travel times vehicles). Bazzan Roozemonds
techniques still assume traditional signaling mechanisms human drivers.
641

fiDresner & Stone

6.4.2 Platoons
addition multi-intersection systems, multi-vehicle systems focus lot
research. Much research centers creating platoons vehicles order minimize
effects stop-and-go driving. Consider line cars stopped red light.
light turns green, first car begins move. Eventually, car behind notices
enough space accelerate well. time later, vehicle back
line begin move, may late actually get intersection
current green phase light. If, hand, vehicles
simultaneously uniformly accelerate, vehicles could make green
phase, vehicles would efficiently use space-time available
cross intersection.
Clement (2002) proposed model called Simple Platoon Advancement (SPA),
addresses exact problem. SPA boasts ability get nearly twice many
vehicles green light (increasing lights throughput) compared normal
human drivers, addition safety delay benefits associated automated control. One vehicles intersection dispersed safe following distances,
control returned human driver.
Halle Chaib-draa (2005) used platoon approach facilitate collaborative
driving general. allow vehicles, controlled separate agents, form
platoons, varying degrees autonomy. Vehicles merge split platoons
using carefully crafted maneuvers, vehicle platoon specific
responsibility. present centralized version, master vehicle gives orders
rest platoon, decentralized version, social laws dictate
agents role, platoons leader acts representative platoons.
platooning systems assume automated control vehicles, use ordinary traffic
lights intersection control. using platoons, methods attempt solve problem
inherent traffic lights themselvesthey designed humans use,
well suited automated vehicle control. work presented article attempts
free autonomous vehicles control traffic lights instead design new system
specifically utilizes capabilities fully autonomous vehicles.
6.4.3 History-Based Traffic Control
Taking different approach intersection control, Balan Luke (2006) use historybased method maximize fairness (all vehicles experience similar delays) opposed
efficiency (the average vehicle experiences short delays). paradigm, vehicles
historically (previously journey) experienced long delays
likely experience shorter delays subsequent intersections. addition
multi-intersection approach, method uses marketplace model involving system
credits given taken exchange shorter longer delays, respectively.
Coordination individual intersections still done traditional traffic lights, timings part mechanism. Interestingly, fairness approach actually yields
results reasonably efficient.
642

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

6.5 Machine Learning Traffic
Abdulhai et al. (2003) used Q-learning, simple, yet powerful form reinforcement
learning, on-line adaptive signal control. work, authors explore
isolated intersection well linear chain intersections. demonstrate Qlearning significantly reduce delays vehicles quickly adapt changing traffic
patterns. Bull et al. (2004) shown Learning Classifier Systems (LCS) make
traditional traffic signals efficient. Wiering (2000) demonstrated multiagent,
model-based reinforcement learning used optimize signal timings
complex networks intersections.
focusing intersections, Moriarty Langley (1998) shown
reinforcement learningspecifically neuro-evolutioncan train efficient driver agents
lane, speed, route selection freeway driving, critical components
fully autonomous vehicle. Additionally, many object tracking detection
examples mentioned previously use neural networks classify objects.
6.6 Physical Robots
real autonomous vehicles, Kolodko Vlacic (2003) created small-scale system
intersection control similar granularity-1 FCFS policy. authors
developed mechanism small Cooperative Autonomous Mobile Robots (CAMRs),
30 cm diameter top speed 10 cm/s. CAMRs
programmed follow Australian traffic laws, communicate several different types
messages. demonstrated CAMRs, mechanism scaled use Imara
vehicles, much larger (capable carrying two human passengers) faster (top
speed 30 km/h). system completely distributed require extensive
infrastructure intersection. However, assume vehicles cooperate
one another.
6.7 Safety Analysis
Section 5 includes failure-mode analysis proposed intersection control mechanism. best knowledge, first study impact
autonomous intersection protocol driver safety. However, enormous
body work regarding safety properties traditional intersections. includes
generalcorrelating traffic level accident frequency (Sayed & Zein, 1999) analyses
particular types intersections (Bonneson & McCoy, 1993; Harwood, Bauer, Potts, Torbic, Richard, Rabbani, Hauer, Elefteriadou, & Griffith, 2003; Persaud, Retting, Gardner,
& Lord, 2001)as well plenty esoteric work, characterizing role
Alzheimers Disease intersection collisions (Rizzo, McGehee, Dawson, & Anderson,
2001). However, concerns human-operated vehicles, none work
particularly applicable setting concerned with.

7. Conclusion Future Work
reservation system presented large step toward easing traffic woes, terms
wasted time injury loss life. However, substantial work must still done
643

fiDresner & Stone

system ready deploy. work represents possible future directions
line research. example, detailed studies safety properties
systemhow reacts various failures whether effects failures
mitigatedare required. Another area ripe improvement intersection manager.
manager switch among several different policies, learning reservation histories policy best suited particular traffic conditions, could significantly improve
performance. Furthermore, light model could react traffic conditions,
presence individual vehicles, might better able exploit abilities
autonomous vehicles, without adversely affecting human drivers. Framing intersection
marketplace space-time commodity could allow system handle vehicle priorities intelligently allow driver agents exchange long wait one day
quick passage later, important day. Finally, driver agent may
able benefit machine learning techniques, perhaps learning make
accurate reservations thus needing cancel less frequently.

article makes three main contributions. First, defines problem autonomous
intersection management, including set desiderata potential solutions
evaluated. Second, presents framework meet desiderata,
algorithm (FCFS) shows advantages framework current intersection
control methods. Third, demonstrates framework extended allow
human-driven (not autonomous) vehicles use system, still exploiting abilities
autonomous vehicles increase throughput subsequently decrease delays.

Getting today future humans longer burdened
mundane yet dangerous task piloting automobiles involve vast amount
work many different disciplines. extensively address engineering
societal challenges involved building deploying system, article suggests
algorithmically feasible worthwhile (in terms decreasing delay)
so.

Acknowledgments

research supported NSF CAREER award IIS-0237699, experiments
carried machines provided NSF grant EIA-0303609.
644

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Appendix A. Simplified Laser Range Finder
appendix describes implementation detail driver agents sensor model. Recall
Section 3.1.1 driver access set simulated external sensors.
set simplified laser range finder, intended give agent type
information actual laser range finder, without expensive computation required
fully simulate sensor. Instead, simplified laser range finder sensor examines
vehicle within sensor range determines closest front sensing
vehicle. Then, records point vehicle closest sensing vehicle
provides distance angle point.
Modern laser range finders distance sensors provide large amount distance
angle data mobile agent. real life setting, information would definitely
prove useful fine-tuning driver agent. However, simple simulation, must process
sensor information vehicles simultaneously, accurately simulating full laserrange finder feasible. Thus, use simple, yet pertinent sensor reading
driver agent use control actions respect vehicles. purely
straight-ahead sensor suffices vehicles traveling straight lines. However,
vehicle turns, must take account going direction
turning. complicate matters, vehicle turning must still take
account going directly front point might straighten
wheels continue current heading. sensor points direction
wheels sufficient vehicles coming turns may run
vehicles ahead them. Instead, sensors scope widens direction turn,
narrowing slightly side. Figure 26 shows scenario demonstrates
concept. testament sensors usefulness, vehicles equipped sensor
(i.e. intersection manager present) able avoid many collisions intersection,
even moderate amounts traffic.

Appendix B. Communication Protocol
Section 3.2 gave brief introduction communication protocol used agents
reservation system. appendix, specify protocol much greater detail.
protocol consists several message types kind agent, well rules
governing messages sent sorts guarantees accompany them.
section present aspects essential understanding remainder
article.
B.1 Message Types
vehicles intersection manager restricted types messages
must coordinate.
B.1.1 Vehicle Intersection
four types messages sent vehicles intersection.
645

fiDresner & Stone

Figure 26: depiction sensor model driver agents. sensor focused
gray lines provide information outside them.
black line represents reading provided driver agent.

1. Request message vehicle sends reservation
wishes make one. contains properties vehicle (ID number, performance, size, etc.) well properties proposed reservation (arrival time,
arrival velocity, type turn, arrival lane, etc.). message communicates
vehicles status emergency vehicle (in emergency situation). practice,
would implemented using secure method normal vehicles could
impersonate emergency vehicles. methods well understood details
implementation beyond scope research.
message 15 fields:
vehicle id unique identifier vehicle.
arrival time absolute time vehicle agrees arrive intersection.
arrival lane unique identifier lane vehicle
arrives intersection.
turn way vehicle turn reaches intersection.
arrival velocity velocity vehicle agrees traveling
arrives intersection.
maximum velocity maximum velocity vehicle travel.
maximum acceleration maximum rate vehicle accelerate.
646

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

minimum acceleration minimum rate vehicle accelerate (i.e.
negative number representing maximum deceleration).
vehicle length length vehicle.
vehicle width width vehicle.
front wheel displacement distance front vehicle
front axle.
rear wheel displacement distance front vehicle
rear axle.
max steering angle maximum angle front wheels turned
purposes steering.
max turn per second rate vehicle turn wheels.
emergency whether emergency vehicle emergency situation.
2. Change-Request message vehicle sends reservation,
would switch different set parameters. new parameters
acceptable intersection, vehicle may keep old reservation.
identical request message, except includes unique reservation ID
reservation vehicle currently has.
message identical Request message, except one added field:
reservation id identifier reservation changed.
3. Cancel message vehicle sends longer desires current
reservation.
2 fields:
vehicle id unique identifier vehicle.
reservation id identifier reservation cancelled.
4. Done message sent vehicle completed traversal
intersection. communicates information Cancel message,
may behavior tied Cancel message occur vehicle successfully completes trip across intersection. Additionally, message
could extended order communicate statistics vehicle, could
recorded order analyze performance intersection manager.
message used collect statistics vehicle, recorded
order analyze improve performance intersection manager.
2 fields:
vehicle id unique identifier vehicle.
reservation id identifier reservation completed.
647

fiDresner & Stone

B.1.2 Intersection Vehicle
four types messages sent intersection individual
vehicles.
1. Confirm message response vehicles Request (or Change-Request)
message. always mean parameters transmitted vehicle
acceptable. could, example, contain counter-offer intersection.
reservation parameters message implicitly accepted vehicle,
must explicitly cancelled driver agent vehicle approve. Note
safe even faulty communicationthe worst happen
intersection reserves space get used. Included message
acceleration constraints determined intersection. list rates
durations. list created depends intersection manager. However,
vehicles safety must guaranteed adheres list.
message 7 fields:
reservation id unique identifier reservation created.
arrival time absolute time vehicle expected arrive.
early error tolerable error (early) arrival time vehicle.
late error tolerable error (late) arrival time vehicle. Note
intersection manager must assume car could arrive traverse
intersection time within resulting bounds
arrival lane unique identifier lane vehicle
arrives intersection.
arrival velocity velocity vehicle expected traveling
arrives intersection. negative number signifies velocity
acceptable.
accelerations run-length encoded description expected acceleration
vehicle travels intersection. Here, run-length encoded description sequence order pairs acceleration durationstarting
instant vehicle enters intersection, maintain
acceleration duration paired. sequence empty,
accelerations acceptable.
2. Reject sending message, intersection inform vehicle
parameters sent latest Request (or Change-Request) acceptable,
intersection either could want make counter-offer.
message indicates whether rejection reservation
manager requires vehicle stop intersection entering. lets
driver agent know attempt reservations reaches
intersection.
message 1 field:
648

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

stop required boolean value indicating whether vehicle must first come
full stop entering intersection.
3. Acknowledge message acknowledges receipt Cancel Done
message.
1 field:
reservation id unique identifier reservation cancelled completed.
4. Emergency-Stop message sent intersection manager
determined collision similar problem occurred intersection.
message informs receiving driver agent reservation requests
granted, possible, vehicle attempt stop instead entering
intersection, even reservation. specifics message used
discussed Section 5.2.2. message fields, communicates
single bit information.
B.1.3 Vehicle Vehicle
currently protocol communication vehicles.
B.2 Protocol Actions
addition message types, agents involved (the vehicles intersection) must
obey set rules. entirely unlike rules human drivers follow
driving.
B.2.1 Vehicle Actions
rules vehicles expected follow order allow intersection
function efficiently.
1. vehicle may enter intersection without reservation.
2. vehicle going cross intersection, must everything reasonable within
power cross accordance parameters included recent
Confirm message received intersection.
3. vehicle sends another message intersection manager sent response,
intersection manager may choose ignore it. Thus, vehicle send
message received response previous message.
4. vehicle yet entered intersection reservation,
may send Request message. yet entered intersection
reservation, may send either Change-Request Cancel message.
sends messages allowed to, intersection may choose
ignore them.
5. vehicle reservation successfully crossed intersection, may send
Done message.
649

fiDresner & Stone

6. vehicle receives Confirm message, considered reservation.
B.2.2 Intersection Actions
rules representing obligations intersection manager expected
fulfill.
1. intersection receives Request message, must respond either
Confirm Reject message. responds Confirm message, guaranteeing cross-traffic interfere vehicle crosses intersection
accordance parameters message.
2. intersection receives Change-Request message, must respond
either Confirm Reject message. responds Confirm message,
guaranteeing cross-traffic interfere vehicle crosses intersection accordance parameters message. previous guarantees
nullified.
3. intersection receives Cancel message, must respond Acknowledge message. guarantee made sending vehicle nullified.

Appendix C. Driver Agent
stated Section 3.3, main focus work improving framework
algorithms intersection control. However, order require sort
driver agent. Furthermore, efficiency reservation framework depends driver
agents reasonably intelligent, non-trivial. appendix describes driver
agent implementation used experiments.
Containing behaviors control turning vehicles well optimizations increase
peformance system overall, driver agent represents single intricate component reservation mechanism. Algorithm 3 gives high-level pseudocode description
driver agent.
C.1 Lane Following
Given model lanes, driver must able drive vehicles lanes.
accomplish means lane following behavior acts modifying
steering angle vehicle. behavior entirely independent rest agents
behavior, controls vehicles acceleration communicates intersection
manager. behavior active timesthe vehicle always attempting stay
current lane. lane-following behavior designed robust sudden lane
reassignment, turning lane changing implemented: driver
agent simply changes lane current lane, lane-following behavior steers
vehicle correct lane. process entirely smooth, provided vehicle
traveling reasonable velocitya condition enforced parts driver agents
behavior.
lanes modeled directed line segments, lane-following behavior attempts keep vehicle evenly straddling lane. line segment represents
650

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

middle lane, thus condition equivalent keeping vehicle centered
lane. driver agent accomplishes turning front wheels toward point
segment. point, call aim point farther along segment
vehicle. aim point computed first projecting point front center
vehicle onto line segment, displacing point direction line
segment amount call lead distance. part, lead distance
proportional velocity vehicle. proportion smaller inside intersection
vehicles pull strongly new lane turningthey must
entirely correct lane leave intersection collide
vehicles outside intersection. proportional lead distance necessary
otherwise high velocities, required steering angle may change faster
driver agent steer, resulting either wildly erratic steering vehicle driving
circles. lead distance minimum value 1 meter. lead distance gets
small, effect velocity largeby ensuring aim point
least meter farther lane, ensure vehicle end
stable configuration traveling proper direction. Figure 27 depicts driver
agent determines lead distance (and subsequent aim point) different velocities.



b

c

Figure 27: vehicle attempting follow lane. so, first calculates point
represents projection position onto directed line segment
running center lane (a). Then, depending velocity,
displaces resulting point direction travel small large amount
obtain point aim front wheels. low velocities,
point displaced muchonly enough ensure vehicle moves
correct direction (b). higher velocities, aim point must farther
along lane, vehicles steering gradual thus
stable (c).

method lane following one possible method, selected
sufficient purposes. Furthermore, reservation systems functionality
depend driver agent using particular method, work method,
provided driver agent turns within mutually understood constraints.
651

fiDresner & Stone

C.2 Optimistic Pessimistic Driver Agents
nave driver agent perform poorly when, example, makes reservation
stuck behind slower-moving vehicle. vehicle front eventually accelerates, would
ideally accelerate well (possibly switching earlier reservation).
account situations this, introduce notion optimistic pessimistic
driver agent. optimistic agent makes reservation assuming arrive intersection minimum possible time. agent finds longer stuck behind
slower vehicle become optimistic attempt make new, earlier reservation.
pessimistic agent assumes stuck current velocity reaches intersection. agent cancel reservation way arrive
time, becomes pessimistic. Due relatively infrequent smooth transitions
moods, driver agent take advantage improving circumstances
without causing send excessive numbers messages things change.
shown Figure 2, addition optimism pessimism driver agent
reduced average number reservations made well average number
messages transmitted. expected, effect less pronounced lower amounts
traffic.


Without

Messages
560.85
5.97

Reservations
165.89
1.02

Table 2: moderate amount traffic, average number messages sent reservations made driver agents without optimism/pessimism heuristic.

C.3 Estimating Time Intersection
driver agents estimate long take get intersection must
precise vehicles arrive time reservations. If, point,
vehicle certain whether arrive schedule, cannot safely continue.
pessimistic driver agent simply divides distance intersection current
velocityit assumes able accelerate. optimistic driver first determines
velocity arrives. turning, example, velocity may
lower speed limit. Otherwise, may limited amount vehicle
accelerate reaching intersection. computes minimum possible time
reach intersection velocity, is, assumes accelerate much
possible decelerating arrival velocity.
652

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Algorithm 3 driver agent behavior. driver agents initialized optimistic.
1: determine aim point attempt point wheels
2: current time
3: Velocity speed limit
4:
Accelerate
5: intersection
6:
Optimistic
7:
ti optimisitic estimate time intersection
8:
else
9:
ti pessimistic estimate time intersection
10:
reservation
11:
+ ti scheduled arrival
12:
Cancel reservation
13:
become pessimistic
14:
else + ti significantly scheduled arrival
15:
Become optimistic
16:
Attempt change reservation earlier time
17:
else
18:
Try make reservation according ti
19:
Reservation request rejected
20:
Decelerate
21: else intersection
22:
Set acceleration according parameters reservation
23: intersection less 1 second behind car front
24:
Decelerate

References
Abdulhai, B., Pringle, R., & Karakoulas, G. J. (2003). Reinforcement learning true
adaptive traffic signal control. Journal Transportation Engineering, 129 (3), 278
285.
Alvarez, L., & Horowitz, R. (1997). Traffic flow control automated highway systems.
Tech. rep. UCB-ITS-PRR-97-47, University California, Berkeley, Berkeley, California, USA.
Balan, G., & Luke, S. (2006). History-based traffic control. Proceedings Fifth
International Joint Conference Autonomous Agents Multiagent Systems, pp.
616621, Hakodate, Japan.
Bazzan, A. L. C. (2005). distributed approach coordination traffic signal agents.
Autonomous Agents Multi-Agent Systems, 10(2), 131164.
Bishop, R. (2005). Intelligent Vehicle Technology Trends. Artech House.
Bonneson, J. A., & McCoy, P. T. (1993). Estimation safety two-way stopcontrolled
intersections rural highways. Transportation Research Record, 1401, 8389.
653

fiDresner & Stone

Bull, L., ShaAban, J., Tomlinson, A., Addison, J. D., & Heydecker, B. G. (2004). Towards
distributed adaptive control road traffic junction signals using learning classifier
systems. Bull, L. (Ed.), Applications Learning Classifier Systems, pp. 276299.
Springer.
Clement, S. (2002). SPA model smooth acceleration. 24th Conference
Australian Institutes Transport Research (CAITR-2002), Sydney, Australia.
DARPA (2007). DARPA urban challenge.. http://www.darpa.mil/grandchallenge.
Dresner, K., & Stone, P. (2004). Multiagent traffic management: reservation-based intersection control mechanism. Third International Joint Conference Autonomous Agents Multiagent Systems, pp. 530537, New York, NY, USA.
Dresner, K., & Stone, P. (2006). Multiagent traffic management: Opportunities multiagent learning. K. Tuyls et al. (Ed.), LAMAS 2005, Vol. 3898 Lecture Notes
Artificial Intelligence, pp. 129138. Springer Verlag, Berlin.
Gavrila, D. M., Giebel, J., & Munder, S. (2004). Vision-based pedestrian detection:
PROTECTOR+ system. Proceedings IEEE Intelligent Vehicles Symposium
(IV2004), Parma, Italy.
Gepperth, A., Edelbrunner, J., & Bucher, T. (2005). Real-time detection classification
cars video sequences. Proceedings IEEE Intelligent Vehicle Symposium
(IV2005), pp. 625631, Las Vegas, NV, USA.
Halle, S., & Chaib-draa, B. (2005). collaborative driving system based multiagent
modelling simulations. Journal Transportation Research Part C (TRC-C):
Emergent Technologies, 13, 320345.
Harwood, D. W., Bauer, K. M., Potts, I. B., Torbic, D. J., Richard, K. R., Rabbani, E.
R. K., Hauer, E., Elefteriadou, L., & Griffith, M. S. (2003). Safety effectiveness
intersection left- right-turn lanes. Transportation Research Record, 1840, 131139.
Hatipo, C., Redmill, K., & Ozguner, U. (1997). Steering lane change: working system.
IEEE Conference Intelligent Transportation Systems, pp. 272277.
Hunt, P. B., Robertson, D. I., Bretherton, R. D., & Winton, R. I. (1981). SCOOT - traffic
responsive method co-ordinating signals. Tech. rep. TRRL-LR-1014, Transport
Road Research Laboratory.
Johnson, R. C. (2005). Steady pace takes DARPA race. EE Times. Accessed http:
//www.eetimes.com.
Kohl, N., Stanley, K., Miikkulainen, R., Samples, M., & Sherony, R. (2006). Evolving
real-world vehicle warning system. Proceedings Genetic Evolutionary
Computation Conference 2006, Seattle, WA, USA.
Kolodko, J., & Vlacic, L. (2003). Cooperative autonomous driving intelligent control
systems laboratory. IEEE Intelligent Systems, 18 (4), 811.
Laumonier, J., Desjardins, C., & Chaib-draa, B. (2006). Cooperative adaptive cruise control:
reinforcement learning approach. Fourth Workshop Agents Traffic
Transportation, Hakodate, Hokkaido, Japan.
654

fiA Multiagent Approach Autonomous Intersection Management

Lindner, F., Kressel, U., & Kaelberer, S. (2004). Robust recognition traffic signals.
Proceedings IEEE Intelligent Vehicles Symposium (IV2004), Parma, Italy.
Liu, X., & Fujimura, K. (2003). Pedestrian detection using stereo night vision. IEEE
International Conference Intelligent Transportation Systems, Shanghai, China.
Mahlisch, M., Oberlander, M., Lohlein, O., Gavrila, D., & Ritter, W. (2005). multiple
detector approach low-resolution FIR pedestrian recognition. Proceedings
IEEE Intelligent Vehicles Symposium (IV2005), Las Vegas, NV, USA.
Moriarty, D., & Langley, P. (1998). Learning cooperative lane selection strategies highways. Proceedings Fifteenth National Conference Artificial Intelligence,
pp. 684691, Madison, WI. AAAI Press.
National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (2002). Economic impact U.S. motor
vehicle crashes reaches $230.6 billion, new NHTSA study shows. NHTSA Press Release
38-02. http://www.nhtsa.dot.gov.
Naumann, R., & Rasche, R. (1997). Intersection collision avoidance means decentralized security communication management autonomous vehicles. Proceedings
30th ISATA - ATT/IST Conference.
Naumann, R., Rasche, R., & Tacken, J. (1998). Managing autonomous vehicles intersections. IEEE Intelligent Systems, 13 (3), 8286.
Noda, I., Jacoff, A., Bredenfeld, A., & Takahashi, Y. (Eds.). (2006). RoboCup-2005: Robot
Soccer World Cup IX. Springer Verlag, Berlin.
NOVA (2006). great robot race.. Originally aired 28 March 2006 PBS, available
online http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/darpa.
Persaud, B. N., Retting, R. A., Gardner, P. E., & Lord, D. (2001). Safety effect roundabout conversions united states: Empirical bayes observational before-after
study. Transportation Research Record, 1751, 18.
Pomerleau, D. A. (1993). Neural Network Perception Mobile Robot Guidance. Kluwer
Academic Publishers.
Ramstrom, O., & Christensen, H. (2005). method following umarked roads.
Proceedings IEEE Intelligent Vehicle Symposium (IV2005), pp. 650655, Las
Vegas, NV, USA.
Rasche, R., Naumann, R., Tacken, J., & Tahedl, C. (1997). Validation simulation
decentralized intersection collision avoidance algorithm. Proceedings IEEE
Conference Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITSC 97).
Reece, D. A., & Shafer, S. (1991). computational model driving autonomous
vehicles. Tech. rep. CMU-CS-91-122, Carnegie Mellon University, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, USA.
Reynolds, C. W. (1999). Steering behaviors autonomous characters. Proceedings
Game Developers Conference, pp. 763782.
Rizzo, M., McGehee, D. V., Dawson, J. D., & Anderson, S. N. (2001). Simulated car crashes
intersections drivers Alzheimer disease. Alzheimer Disease Associated
Disorders, 15 (1), 1020.
655

fiDresner & Stone

Robertson, D. I. (1969). TRANSYT traffic network study tool. Tech. rep. TRRL-LR253, Transport Road Research Laboratory.
Rogers, S., Flechter, C.-N., & Langley, P. (1999). adaptive interactive agent route
advice. Etzioni, O., Muller, J. P., & Bradshaw, J. M. (Eds.), Proceedings Third
International Conference Autonomous Agents (Agents99), pp. 198205, Seattle,
WA, USA. ACM Press.
Roozemond, D. A. (1999). Using intelligent agents urban traffic control systems. Proceedings International Conference Artificial Intelligence Transportation
Systems Science, pp. 6979.
Sayed, T., & Zein, S. (1999). Traffic conflict standards intersections. Transportation
Planning Technology, 22 (4), 309323.
Schonberg, T., Ojala, M., Suomela, J., Torpo, A., & Halme, A. (1995). Positioning
autonomous off-road vehicle using fused DGPS inertial navigation. 2nd
IFAC Conference Intelligent Autonomous Vehicles, pp. 226231.
She, K., Bebis, G., Gu, H., & Miller, R. (2004). Vehicle tracking using on-line fusion
color shape features. Proceedings IEEE International Conference
Intelligent Transportation Systems, Washington, DC, USA.
Stone, P., & Veloso, M. (2000). Multiagent systems: survey machine learning
perspective. Autonomous Robots, 8 (3), 345383.
Svenson, O. (1981). less risky skillful fellow drivers?. Acta
Psychologica, 47 (2), 143148.
Texas Transportation Institute (2004). 2004 urban mobility report.. Accessed http:
//mobility.tamu.edu/ums December 2004.
USDOT (2003). Inside USDOTs intelligent intersection test facility. Newsletter
Cooperative Deployment Network. Accessed online 17 May 2006 http:
//www.ntoctalks.com/icdn/intell_intersection.php.
Watanabe, A., & Nishida, M. (2005). Lane detection steering assistance system.
Proceedings IEEE Intelligent Vehicle Symposium (IV2005), pp. 159164, Las
Vegas, NV, USA.
Wiering, M. A. (2000). Multi-agent reinforcement learning traffic light control.
Langley, P. (Ed.), Proceedings Seventeenth International Conference Machine
Learning (ICML2000), pp. 11511158.
Wierwille, W. W., Hanowski, R. J., Hankey, J. M., Kieliszewski, C. A., Lee, S. E., Medina,
A., Keisler, A. S., & Dingus, T. A. (2002). Identification evaluation driver
errors: Overview recommendations. Tech. rep. FHWA-RD-02-003, Virginia Tech
Transportation Institute, Blacksburg, Virginia, USA. Sponsored Federal Highway Administration.
Wu, S.-J., Chiang, H.-H., Perng, J.-W., Lee, T.-T., & Chen, C.-J. (2005). automated
lane-keeping design intelligent vehicle. Proceedings IEEE Intelligent
Vehicle Symposium (IV2005), pp. 508513, Las Vegas, NV, USA.

656


